Florida, session 2026, HB789.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
32
33 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Freedom 2 – The
34 School and Non-school Ad Valorem Elimination Act."
35 Section 2. Paragraph (r) of subsection (1) of section
36 125.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
37 125.01 Powers and duties.—
38 (1) The legislative and governing body of a county shall
39 have the power to carry on county government. To the extent not
40 inconsistent with general or special law, this power includes,
41 but is not restricted to, the power to:
42 (r) Levy and collect taxes, both for county purposes and
43 for the providing of municipal services within any municipal
44 service taxing unit, and special assessments; borrow and expend
45 money; and issue bonds, revenue certificates, and other
46 obligations of indebtedness, which power shall be exercised in
47 such manner, and subject to such limitations, as may be provided
48 by general law. There shall be no referendum required for the
49 levy by a county of ad valorem taxes, both for county purposes
50 and for the providing of municipal services within any municipal
Page 2 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
51 service taxing unit.
52 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county
53 may not levy special assessments on lands classified as
54 agricultural lands under s. 193.461 unless the revenue from such
55 assessments has been pledged for debt service and is necessary
56 to meet obligations of bonds or certificates issued by the
57 county which remain outstanding on July 1, 2023, including
58 refundings thereof for debt service savings where the maturity
59 of the debt is not extended. For bonds or certificates issued
60 after July 1, 2023, special assessments securing such bonds may
61 not be levied on lands classified as agricultural under s.
62 193.461.
63 2. The provisions of subparagraph 1. do not apply to
64 residential structures and their curtilage.
65 Section 3. Section 159.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to
66 read:
67 159.16 Additional pledge of faith and credit.—
68 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any
69 county or municipality issuing revenue bonds hereunder for any
70 of the purposes provided in this part, shall have power to
71 pledge the full faith and credit and ad valorem taxing power of
72 such county or municipality for the payment of the principal of
73 or interest on such revenue bonds if the issuance of such
74 revenue bonds with such additional pledge shall have approval by
75 the qualified electors who are freeholders residing in such
Page 3 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
76 county or municipality in an election called, conducted and held
77 in the manner provided in the constitution and statutes of
78 Florida for the holding of freeholder elections.
79 (2) In the event such additional pledge is made the county
80 or municipality shall be obligated to levy ad valorem taxes
81 without limit as to rate or amount for the payment of the
82 principal of and interest on such revenue bonds, and the
83 issuance of such revenue bonds with such additional pledge of
84 the faith and credit of such county or municipality shall not be
85 subject to any debt limitation contained in any other law,
86 general, special or local.
87 Section 4. Paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
88 163.3182, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
89 163.3182 Transportation deficiencies.—
90 (1) DEFINITIONS.—For purposes of this section, the term:
91 (i) "Taxing authority" means a public body that levies or
92 is authorized to levy an ad valorem tax on real property located
93 within a transportation deficiency area, except a school
94 district.
95 Section 5. Subsection (1) of section 190.021, Florida
96 Statutes, is amended to read:
97 190.021 Taxes; non-ad valorem assessments.—
98 (1) AD VALOREM TAXES.—An elected board shall have the
99 power to levy and assess an ad valorem tax on all the taxable
100 property in the district to construct, operate, and maintain
Page 4 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
101 assessable improvements; to pay the principal of, and interest
102 on, any general obligation bonds of the district; and to provide
103 for any sinking or other funds established in connection with
104 any such bonds. An ad valorem tax levied by the board for
105 operating purposes, exclusive of debt service on bonds, shall
106 not exceed 3 mills, except that a district authorized by a local
107 general-purpose government to exercise one or more powers
108 specified in s. 190.012(2) may levy an additional 2 mills for
109 operating purposes, exclusive of debt service on bonds. The ad
110 valorem tax provided for herein shall be in addition to county
111 and all other ad valorem taxes provided for by law. Such tax
112 shall be assessed, levied, and collected in the same manner and
113 same time as other ad valorem county taxes. The levy of ad
114 valorem taxes shall be approved by referendum when required by
115 the State Constitution.
116 Section 6. Subsection (1) of section 191.009, Florida
117 Statutes, is amended to read:
118 191.009 Taxes; non-ad valorem assessments; impact fees and
119 user charges.—
120 (1) AD VALOREM TAXES.—An elected board may levy and assess
121 ad valorem taxes on all taxable property in the district to
122 construct, operate, and maintain district facilities and
123 services, to pay the principal of, and interest on, general
124 obligation bonds of the district, and to provide for any sinking
125 or other funds established in connection with such bonds. An ad
Page 5 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
126 valorem tax levied by the board for operating purposes,
127 exclusive of debt service on bonds, may not exceed 3.75 mills
128 unless a higher amount has been previously authorized by law,
129 subject to a referendum as required by the State Constitution
130 and this act. The ballot question on such referendum shall state
131 the currently authorized millage rate and the year of its
132 approval by referendum. The levy of ad valorem taxes pursuant to
133 this section must be approved by referendum called by the board
134 when the proposed levy of ad valorem taxes exceeds the amount
135 authorized by prior special act, general law of local
136 application, or county ordinance approved by referendum. Nothing
137 in this act shall require a referendum on the levy of ad valorem
138 taxes in an amount previously authorized by special act, general
139 law of local application, or county ordinance approved by
140 referendum. Such tax shall be assessed, levied, and collected in
141 the same manner as other ad valorem county taxes. The levy of ad
142 valorem taxes approved by referendum shall be reported within 60
143 days after the vote to the Department of Commerce.
144 Section 7. Subsection (4) of section 192.001, Florida
145 Statutes, is amended to read:
146 192.001 Definitions.—All definitions set out in chapters 1
147 and 200 that are applicable to this chapter are included herein.
148 In addition, the following definitions shall apply in the
149 imposition of ad valorem taxes:
150 (4) "County tax collector" means the county officer
Page 6 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
151 charged with the collection of ad valorem taxes levied by the
152 county, the school board, any special taxing districts within
153 the county, and all municipalities within the county.
154 Section 8. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsections
155 (2) and (4) of section 192.091, Florida Statutes, are amended to
156 read:
157 192.091 Commissions of property appraisers and tax
158 collectors.—
159 (1)(a) The budget of the property appraiser's office, as
160 approved by the Department of Revenue, shall be the basis upon
161 which the several tax authorities of each county, except
162 municipalities and the district school board, shall be billed by
163 the property appraiser for services rendered. Each such taxing
164 authority shall be billed an amount that bears the same
165 proportion to the total amount of the budget as its share of ad
166 valorem taxes bore to the total levied for the preceding year.
167 All municipal and school district taxes shall be considered as
168 taxes levied by the county for purposes of this computation.
169 (2) The tax collectors of the several counties of the
170 state shall be entitled to receive, upon the amount of all real
171 and tangible personal property taxes and special assessments
172 collected and remitted, the following commissions:
173 (a) On the county tax:
174 1. Ten percent on the first $100,000;
175 2. Five percent on the next $100,000;
Page 7 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
176 3. Three percent on the balance up to the amount of taxes
177 collected and remitted on an assessed valuation of $50 million;
178 and
179 4. Two percent on the balance.
180 (b) On collections on behalf of each taxing district and
181 special assessment district:
182 (a)1.a. Three percent on the amount of taxes collected and
183 remitted on an assessed valuation of $50 million; and
184 2.b. Two percent on the balance; and
185 (b)2. Actual costs of collection, not to exceed 2 percent,
186 on the amount of special assessments collected and remitted.
187
188 For the purposes of this subsection, the commissions on the
189 amount of taxes collected from the nonvoted school millage, and
190 on the amount of additional taxes that would be collected for
191 school districts if the exemptions applicable to homestead
192 property for school district taxation were the same as
193 exemptions applicable for all other ad valorem taxation, shall
194 be paid by the board of county commissioners.
195 (4) The commissions for collecting taxes assessed for or
196 levied by the state shall be audited, allowed, and paid by the
197 Chief Financial Officer as other warrants are paid; and
198 commissions for collecting the county taxes shall be audited and
199 paid by the boards of county commissioners of the several
200 counties of this state. The commissions for collecting all
Page 8 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
201 special school district taxes shall be audited by the school
202 board of each respective district and taken out of the funds of
203 the respective special school district under its control and
204 allowed and paid to the tax collectors for collecting such
205 taxes; and the commissions for collecting all other district
206 taxes, whether special or not, shall be audited and paid by the
207 governing board or commission having charge of the financial
208 obligations of such district. All commissions for collecting
209 special tax district taxes shall be paid at the time and in the
210 manner now, or as may hereafter be, provided for the payment of
211 the commissions for the collection of county taxes. All amounts
212 paid as compensation to any tax collector under the provisions
213 of this or any other law shall be a part of the general income
214 or compensation of such officer for the year in which received,
215 and nothing contained in this section shall be held or construed
216 to affect or increase the maximum salary as now provided by law
217 for any such officer.
218 Section 9. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 192.102,
219 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
220 192.102 Payment of property appraisers' and collectors'
221 commissions.—
222 (1) Each taxing authority and the board of county
223 commissioners and school board of each county shall advance and
224 pay to the county tax collector of each such county, at the
225 first meeting of such board each month from October through July
Page 9 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
226 of each year, on demand of the county tax collector, an amount
227 equal to one-twelfth of the commissions on the county taxes
228 levied on the county tax roll for such authority during the
229 preceding year and one-twelfth of the commissions on county
230 occupational and beverage licenses paid to the tax collector in
231 the preceding fiscal year. To demand the first advance under
232 this section, each tax collector shall submit to the taxing
233 authority or board of county commissioners a statement showing
234 the calculation of the commissions on which the amount of each
235 advance is to be based.
236 (2) On or before November 1 of each year, each tax
237 collector who has received advances under the provisions of this
238 section shall make an accounting to the taxing authority and the
239 board of county commissioners and the school board, and any
240 adjustments necessary shall be made so that the total advances
241 and commissions paid by the taxing authority and board of county
242 commissioners and the school board shall be the amount of
243 commissions earned. At no time within the year shall there be
244 paid by the taxing authority and board of county commissioners
245 and the school board more than the total advances due to that
246 date or the commissions earned to that date, whichever is the
247 greater. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to abrogate
248 any law providing a salary for the tax collector or require the
249 tax collector to accept the benefits of this section.
250 Section 10. Paragraphs (g) through (w) of subsection (2)
Page 10 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
251 of section 193.114, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
252 paragraphs (e) through (u), respectively, and present paragraphs
253 (b) through (f) of subsection (2) and paragraph (f) of
254 subsection (3) of that section are amended, to read:
255 193.114 Preparation of assessment rolls.—
256 (2) The real property assessment roll shall include:
257 (b) The school district assessed value.
258 (c) The nonschool district assessed value.
259 (c)(d) The difference between just value and school
260 district and nonschool district assessed value for each
261 statutory provision resulting in such difference.
262 (d)(e) The school taxable value.
263 (f) The nonschool taxable value.
264 (3) The tangible personal property roll shall include:
265 (f) The difference between just value and school district
266 and nonschool district assessed value for each statutory
267 provision resulting in such difference.
268 Section 11. Subsection (11) of section 193.1145, Florida
269 Statutes, is amended to read:
270 193.1145 Interim assessment rolls.—
271 (11) A recomputation of millage rates under this section
272 shall not reduce or increase the total of all revenues available
273 from state or local sources to a school district or to a unit of
274 local government as defined in part II of chapter 218.
275 Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7), the
Page 11 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
276 provisional millage rates levied by a multicounty taxing
277 authority against an interim roll shall not be recomputed, but
278 shall be considered the official or final tax rate for the year
279 in question; and the interim roll shall be considered the final
280 roll for each such taxing authority. Notwithstanding the
281 provisions of subsection (7), millage rates adopted by vote of
282 the electors pursuant to s. 9(b) or s. 12, Art. VII of the State
283 Constitution shall not be recomputed.
284 Section 12. Subsection (2) of section 193.1554, Florida
285 Statutes, is amended to read:
286 193.1554 Assessment of nonhomestead residential property.—
287 (2) For all levies other than school district levies,
288 nonhomestead residential property shall be assessed at just
289 value as of January 1 of the year that the property becomes
290 eligible for assessment pursuant to this section.
291 Section 13. Subsection (2) of section 193.1555, Florida
292 Statutes, is amended to read:
293 193.1555 Assessment of certain residential and
294 nonresidential real property.—
295 (2) For all levies other than school district levies,
296 nonresidential real property and residential real property that
297 is not assessed under s. 193.155 or s. 193.1554 shall be
298 assessed at just value as of January 1 of the year that the
299 property becomes eligible for assessment pursuant to this
300 section.
Page 12 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
301 Section 14. Section 195.052, Florida Statutes, is amended
302 to read:
303 195.052 Research and tabulation of data.—The department
304 shall conduct constant research and maintain accurate
305 tabulations of data and conditions existing as to ad valorem
306 taxation, shall annually publish such data as may be appropriate
307 to facilitate fiscal policymaking, and shall annually make such
308 recommendations to the Legislature as are necessary to ensure
309 that property is valued according to its just value and is
310 equitably taxed throughout the state. Such data shall include
311 the annual percentage increase in total nonvoted ad valorem
312 taxes levied by each taxing authority city and county and shall
313 include information on the distribution of ad valorem taxes
314 levied among the various classifications of property, including
315 homestead, nonhomestead residential, new construction,
316 commercial, and industrial properties. Such data shall include
317 the previous year's adopted millage rate, the current year's
318 millage rate, and the current percentage increase in taxes
319 levied above the rolled-back rate. Such data shall be published,
320 at a minimum, on the department's website and on the websites of
321 all property appraisers of this state, if available. Publication
322 shall occur not later than 90 days after receipt of extended
323 rolls for all counties pursuant to s. 193.122(7).
324 Section 15. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
325 196.031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 13 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
326 196.031 Exemption of homesteads.—
327 (1)
328 (b) Every person who qualifies to receive the exemption
329 provided in paragraph (a) is entitled to an additional exemption
330 of up to $25,000 on the assessed valuation greater than $50,000
331 for all levies other than school district levies. The $25,000
332 value of the additional exemption provided in this paragraph
333 shall be adjusted annually on January 1 of each year for
334 inflation using the percentage change in the Consumer Price
335 Index for All Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, all items
336 1967=100, or successor reports for the preceding calendar year
337 as initially reported by the United States Department of Labor,
338 Bureau of Labor Statistics, if such percent change is positive.
339 Section 16. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 200.001,
340 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
341 200.001 Millages; definitions and general provisions.—
342 (1) County millages shall be composed of two four
343 categories of millage rates, as follows:
344 (a) General county millage, which shall be that nonvoted
345 millage rate set by the governing body of the county.
346 (a)(b) County debt service millage, which shall be that
347 millage rate necessary to raise taxes for debt service as
348 authorized by a vote of the electors pursuant to s. 12, Art. VII
349 of the State Constitution.
350 (c) County voted millage, which shall be that millage rate
Page 14 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
351 set by the governing body of the county as authorized by a vote
352 of the electors pursuant to s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State
353 Constitution.
354 (b)(d) County dependent special district millage, as
355 provided in subsection (5).
356 (3) School millages shall be composed of one category five
357 categories of millage rates, as follows:
358 (a) Nonvoted required school operating millage, which
359 shall be that nonvoted millage rate set by the county school
360 board for current operating purposes and imposed pursuant to s.
361 1011.60(6).
362 (b) Nonvoted discretionary school operating millage, which
363 shall be that nonvoted millage rate set by the county school
364 board for operating purposes other than the rate imposed
365 pursuant to s. 1011.60(6) and other than the rate authorized in
366 s. 1011.71(2).
367 (c) Voted district school operating millage, which shall
368 be that millage rate set by the district school board for
369 current school operating purposes as authorized by the electors
370 pursuant to s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State Constitution.
371 (d) Nonvoted district school capital improvement millage,
372 which shall be that millage rate set by the district school
373 board for capital improvements as authorized in s. 1011.71(2).
374 (e) voted district school debt service millage, which
375 shall be that millage rate set by the district school board as
Page 15 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
376 authorized by a vote of the electors pursuant to s. 12, Art. VII
377 of the State Constitution.
378 Section 17. Section 200.011, Florida Statutes, is amended
379 to read:
380 200.011 Duty of county commissioners and school board in
381 setting rate of taxation.—
382 (1) The county commissioners shall determine the amount to
383 be raised for all county purposes, except for county school
384 purposes, and shall enter upon their minutes the rates to be
385 levied for each fund respectively, together with the rates
386 certified to be levied by the board of county commissioners for
387 use of the county, special taxing district, board, agency, or
388 other taxing unit within the county for which the board of
389 county commissioners is required by law to levy taxes.
390 (2) The county commissioners shall ascertain the aggregate
391 rate necessary to cover all such taxes and certify the same to
392 the property appraiser within 30 days after the adjournment of
393 the value adjustment board. The property appraiser shall carry
394 out the full amount of taxes for all county purposes, except for
395 school purposes, under one heading in the assessment roll to be
396 provided for that purpose, and the county commissioners shall
397 notify the clerk and auditor and tax collector of the county of
398 the amounts to be apportioned to the different accounts out of
399 the total taxes levied for all purposes.
400 (3) The county depository, in issuing receipts to the tax
Page 16 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
401 collector, shall state in each of his or her receipts, which
402 shall be in duplicate, the amount deposited to each fund out of
403 the deposits made with it by the tax collector. When any such
404 receipts shall be given to the tax collector by the county
405 depository, the tax collector shall immediately file one of the
406 same with the clerk and auditor of the county, who shall credit
407 the same to the tax collector with the amount thereof and make
408 out and deliver to the tax collector a certificate setting forth
409 the payment in detail, as shown by the receipt of the county
410 depository.
411 (4) The county commissioners and school board shall file
412 written statements with the property appraiser setting forth the
413 boundary of each special school district and the district or
414 territory in which other special taxes are to be assessed, and
415 the property appraiser shall, upon receipt of such statements
416 and orders from the board of county commissioners and school
417 board setting forth the rate of taxation to be levied on the
418 real and personal property therein, proceed to assess such
419 property and enter the taxes thereon in the assessment rolls to
420 be provided for that purpose.
421 (5) The property appraiser shall designate and separately
422 identify by certificate to the tax collector the rate of
423 taxation to be levied for the use of the county and school board
424 and the total rate of taxation for all other taxing authorities
425 in the county.
Page 17 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
426 (6) The board of county commissioners shall certify to the
427 property appraiser and tax collector the millage rates to be
428 levied for the use of the county and special taxing districts,
429 boards, and authorities and all other taxing units within the
430 county for which the board of county commissioners is required
431 by law to levy taxes. The district school board, Each
432 municipality, and the governing board or governing authority of
433 each special taxing district or other taxing unit within the
434 county the taxes of which are assessed on the tax roll prepared
435 by the property appraiser, but for which the board of county
436 commissioners is not required by law to levy taxes, shall
437 certify to the property appraiser and tax collector the millage
438 rate set by such board, municipality, authority, special taxing
439 district, or taxing unit. The certifications required by this
440 subsection shall be made within 30 days after the value
441 adjustment board adjourns.
442 Section 18. Subsections (12) through (15) of section
443 200.065, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (11)
444 through (14), respectively, and subsection (1), paragraphs (a),
445 (d), (e), (f), and (g) of subsection (2), subsections (3), (5),
446 (6), (9), and (10), and present subsection (11) of that section
447 are amended, to read:
448 200.065 Method of fixing millage.—
449 (1) Upon completion of the assessment of all property
450 pursuant to s. 193.023, the property appraiser shall certify to
Page 18 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
451 each taxing authority the taxable value within the jurisdiction
452 of the taxing authority. This certification shall include a copy
453 of the statement required to be submitted under s. 195.073(3),
454 as applicable to that taxing authority. The form on which the
455 certification is made shall include instructions to each taxing
456 authority describing the proper method of computing a millage
457 rate which, exclusive of new construction, additions to
458 structures, deletions, increases in the value of improvements
459 that have undergone a substantial rehabilitation which increased
460 the assessed value of such improvements by at least 100 percent,
461 property added due to geographic boundary changes, total taxable
462 value of tangible personal property within the jurisdiction in
463 excess of 115 percent of the previous year's total taxable
464 value, and any dedicated increment value, will provide the same
465 ad valorem tax revenue for each taxing authority as was levied
466 during the prior year less the amount, if any, paid or applied
467 as a consequence of an obligation measured by the dedicated
468 increment value. That millage rate shall be known as the
469 "rolled-back rate." The property appraiser shall also include
470 instructions, as prescribed by the Department of Revenue, to
471 each county and municipality, each special district dependent to
472 a county or municipality, each municipal service taxing unit,
473 and each independent special district describing the proper
474 method of computing the millage rates and taxes levied as
475 specified in subsection (5). The Department of Revenue shall
Page 19 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
476 prescribe the instructions and forms that are necessary to
477 administer this subsection and subsection (5). The information
478 provided pursuant to this subsection shall also be sent to the
479 tax collector by the property appraiser at the time it is sent
480 to each taxing authority.
481 (2) No millage shall be levied until a resolution or
482 ordinance has been approved by the governing board of the taxing
483 authority which resolution or ordinance must be approved by the
484 taxing authority according to the following procedure:
485 (a)1. Upon preparation of a tentative budget, but prior to
486 adoption thereof, each taxing authority shall compute a proposed
487 millage rate necessary to fund the tentative budget other than
488 the portion of the budget to be funded from sources other than
489 ad valorem taxes. In computing proposed or final millage rates,
490 each taxing authority shall utilize not less than 95 percent of
491 the taxable value certified pursuant to subsection (1).
492 2. The tentative budget of the county commission shall be
493 prepared and submitted in accordance with s. 129.03.
494 3. The tentative budget of the school district shall be
495 prepared and submitted in accordance with chapter 1011, provided
496 that the date of submission shall not be later than 24 days
497 after certification of value pursuant to subsection (1).
498 2.4. Taxing authorities other than the county and school
499 district shall prepare and consider tentative and final budgets
500 in accordance with this section and applicable provisions of
Page 20 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
501 law, including budget procedures applicable to the taxing
502 authority, provided such procedures do not conflict with general
503 law.
504 (d) Within 15 days after the meeting adopting the
505 tentative budget, the taxing authority shall advertise in a
506 newspaper of general circulation in the county as provided in
507 subsection (3), its intent to finally adopt a millage rate and
508 budget. A public hearing to finalize the budget and adopt a
509 millage rate shall be held not less than 2 days nor more than 5
510 days after the day that the advertisement is first published. In
511 the event of a need to postpone or recess the final meeting due
512 to a declared state of emergency, the taxing authority may
513 postpone or recess the hearing for up to 7 days and shall post a
514 prominent notice at the place of the original hearing showing
515 the date, time, and place where the hearing will be reconvened.
516 The posted notice shall measure not less than 8.5 by 11 inches.
517 The taxing authority shall make every reasonable effort to
518 provide reasonable notification of the continued hearing to the
519 taxpayers. The information must also be posted on the taxing
520 authority's website. During the hearing, the governing body of
521 the taxing authority shall amend the adopted tentative budget as
522 it sees fit, adopt a final budget, and adopt a resolution or
523 ordinance stating the millage rate to be levied. The resolution
524 or ordinance shall state the percent, if any, by which the
525 millage rate to be levied exceeds the rolled-back rate computed
Page 21 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
526 pursuant to subsection (1), which shall be characterized as the
527 percentage increase in property taxes adopted by the governing
528 body. The adoption of the budget and the millage-levy resolution
529 or ordinance shall be by separate votes. For each taxing
530 authority levying millage, the name of the taxing authority, the
531 rolled-back rate, the percentage increase, and the millage rate
532 to be levied shall be publicly announced before the adoption of
533 the millage-levy resolution or ordinance. In no event may the
534 millage rate adopted pursuant to this paragraph exceed the
535 millage rate tentatively adopted pursuant to paragraph (c). If
536 the rate tentatively adopted pursuant to paragraph (c) exceeds
537 the proposed rate provided to the property appraiser pursuant to
538 paragraph (b), or as subsequently adjusted pursuant to
539 subsection (11), each taxpayer within the jurisdiction of the
540 taxing authority shall be sent notice by first-class mail of his
541 or her taxes under the tentatively adopted millage rate and his
542 or her taxes under the previously proposed rate. The notice must
543 be prepared by the property appraiser, at the expense of the
544 taxing authority, and must generally conform to the requirements
545 of s. 200.069. If such additional notice is necessary, its
546 mailing must precede the hearing held pursuant to this paragraph
547 by not less than 10 days and not more than 15 days.
548 (e)1. In the hearings required pursuant to paragraphs (c)
549 and (d), the first substantive issue discussed shall be the
550 percentage increase in millage over the rolled-back rate
Page 22 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
551 necessary to fund the budget, if any, and the specific purposes
552 for which ad valorem tax revenues are being increased. During
553 such discussion, the governing body shall hear comments
554 regarding the proposed increase and explain the reasons for the
555 proposed increase over the rolled-back rate. The general public
556 shall be allowed to speak and to ask questions before adoption
557 of any measures by the governing body. The governing body shall
558 adopt its tentative or final millage rate before adopting its
559 tentative or final budget.
560 2. These hearings shall be held after 5 p.m. if scheduled
561 on a day other than Saturday. No hearing shall be held on a
562 Sunday. The county commission shall not schedule its hearings on
563 days scheduled for hearings by the school board. The hearing
564 dates scheduled by a taxing authority the county commission and
565 school board shall not be utilized by any other taxing authority
566 within the county for its public hearings. However, in counties
567 for which a state of emergency was declared by executive order
568 or proclamation of the Governor pursuant to chapter 252 and the
569 rescheduling of hearings on the same day is unavoidable, the
570 county commission and school board must conduct their hearings
571 at different times, and other taxing authorities must schedule
572 their hearings so as not to conflict with the times of one
573 another the county commission and school board hearings. A
574 multicounty taxing authority shall make every reasonable effort
575 to avoid scheduling hearings on days utilized by another taxing
Page 23 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
576 authority the counties or school districts within its
577 jurisdiction. Tax levies and budgets for dependent special
578 taxing districts shall be adopted at the hearings for the taxing
579 authority to which such districts are dependent, following such
580 discussion and adoption of levies and budgets for the superior
581 taxing authority. A taxing authority may adopt the tax levies
582 for all of its dependent special taxing districts, and may adopt
583 the budgets for all of its dependent special taxing districts,
584 by a single unanimous vote. However, if a member of the general
585 public requests that the tax levy or budget of a dependent
586 special taxing district be separately discussed and separately
587 adopted, the taxing authority shall discuss and adopt that tax
588 levy or budget separately. If, due to circumstances beyond the
589 control of the taxing authority, including a state of emergency
590 declared by executive order or proclamation of the Governor
591 pursuant to chapter 252, the hearing provided for in paragraph
592 (c) or paragraph (d) is recessed or postponed, the taxing
593 authority shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general paid
594 circulation in the county. The notice shall state the time and
595 place for the continuation of the hearing and shall be published
596 at least 2 days but not more than 5 days before the date the
597 hearing will be continued. In the event of postponement or
598 recess due to a declared state of emergency, all subsequent
599 dates in this section shall be extended by the number of days of
600 the postponement or recess. Notice of the postponement or recess
Page 24 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
601 must be in writing by the affected taxing authority to the tax
602 collector, the property appraiser, and the Department of Revenue
603 within 3 calendar days after the postponement or recess. In the
604 event of such extension, the affected taxing authority must work
605 with the county tax collector and property appraiser to ensure
606 timely assessment and collection of taxes.
607 (f)1. Notwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (c) to
608 the contrary, each school district shall advertise its intent to
609 adopt a tentative budget on a publicly accessible website
610 pursuant to s. 50.0311 or in a newspaper of general circulation
611 pursuant to subsection (3) within 29 days after certification of
612 value pursuant to subsection (1). For the purpose of this
613 paragraph, the term "publicly accessible website" includes a
614 district school board's official website if the school board
615 website satisfies the remaining requirements of s. 50.0311. Not
616 less than 2 days or more than 5 days thereafter, the district
617 shall hold a public hearing on the tentative budget pursuant to
618 the applicable provisions of paragraph (c). In the event of
619 postponement or recess due to a declared state of emergency, the
620 school district may postpone or recess the hearing for up to 7
621 days and shall post a prominent notice at the place of the
622 original hearing showing the date, time, and place where the
623 hearing will be reconvened. The posted notice shall measure not
624 less than 8.5 by 11 inches. The school district shall make every
625 reasonable effort to provide reasonable notification of the
Page 25 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
626 continued hearing to the taxpayers. The information must also be
627 posted on the school district's website if the district school
628 board uses a different method of advertisement.
629 2. Notwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (b) to the
630 contrary, each school district shall advise the property
631 appraiser of its recomputed proposed millage rate within 35 days
632 of certification of value pursuant to subsection (1). The
633 recomputed proposed millage rate of the school district shall be
634 considered its proposed millage rate for the purposes of
635 paragraph (b).
636 3. Notwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (d) to the
637 contrary, each school district shall hold a public hearing to
638 finalize the budget and adopt a millage rate within 80 days of
639 certification of value pursuant to subsection (1), but not
640 earlier than 65 days after certification. The hearing shall be
641 held in accordance with the applicable provisions of paragraph
642 (d), except that a newspaper advertisement need not precede the
643 hearing.
644 (f)(g) Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the
645 contrary, a taxing authority may:
646 1. Expend moneys based on its tentative budget after
647 adoption pursuant to paragraph (c) and until such time as its
648 final budget is adopted pursuant to paragraph (d), only if the
649 fiscal year of the taxing authority begins prior to adoption of
650 the final budget or, in the case of a school district, if the
Page 26 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
651 fall term begins prior to adoption of the final budget; or
652 2. Readopt its prior year's adopted final budget, as
653 amended, and expend moneys based on that budget until such time
654 as its tentative budget is adopted pursuant to paragraph (c),
655 only if the fiscal year of the taxing authority begins prior to
656 adoption of the tentative budget. The readopted budget shall be
657 adopted by resolution without notice pursuant to this section at
658 a duly constituted meeting of the governing body.
659 (3) The advertisement shall be published as provided in
660 chapter 50. If the advertisement is published in the print
661 edition of a newspaper, the advertisement must be no less than
662 one-quarter page in size of a standard size or a tabloid size
663 newspaper, and the headline in the advertisement shall be in a
664 type no smaller than 18 point. The advertisement shall not be
665 placed in that portion of the newspaper where legal notices and
666 classified advertisements appear. The advertisement shall be
667 published in a newspaper in the county or in a geographically
668 limited insert of such newspaper. The geographic boundaries in
669 which such insert is circulated shall include the geographic
670 boundaries of the taxing authority. It is the legislative intent
671 that, whenever possible, the advertisement appear in a newspaper
672 that is published at least weekly unless the only newspaper in
673 the county is published less than weekly, or that the
674 advertisement appear in a geographically limited insert of such
675 newspaper which insert is published throughout the taxing
Page 27 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
676 authority's jurisdiction at least twice each week. It is further
677 the legislative intent that the newspaper selected be one of
678 general interest and readership in the community pursuant to
679 chapter 50.
680 (a) For taxing authorities other than school districts
681 which have tentatively adopted a millage rate in excess of 100
682 percent of the rolled-back rate computed pursuant to subsection
683 (1), the advertisement shall be in the following form:
684 NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE
685 The ...(name of the taxing authority)... has tentatively
686 adopted a measure to increase its property tax levy.
687 Last year's property tax levy:
688 A. Initially proposed tax levy..................$XX,XXX,XXX
689 B. Less tax reductions due to Value Adjustment Board and
690 other assessment
691 changes.............................................($XX,XXX,XXX)
692 C. Actual property tax levy.....................$XX,XXX,XXX
693 This year's proposed tax levy.........................$XX,XXX,XXX
694 All concerned citizens are invited to attend a public
695 hearing on the tax increase to be held on ...(date and time)...
696 at ...(meeting place)....
697 A FINAL DECISION on the proposed tax increase and the
698 budget will be made at this hearing.
699 (b) In all instances in which the provisions of paragraph
700 (a) are inapplicable for taxing authorities other than school
Page 28 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
701 districts, the advertisement shall be in the following form:
702 NOTICE OF BUDGET HEARING
703 The ...(name of taxing authority)... has tentatively
704 adopted a budget for ...(fiscal year).... A public hearing to
705 make a FINAL DECISION on the budget AND TAXES will be held on
706 ...(date and time)... at ...(meeting place)....
707 (c) For school districts which have proposed a millage
708 rate in excess of 100 percent of the rolled-back rate computed
709 pursuant to subsection (1) and which propose to levy nonvoted
710 millage in excess of the minimum amount required pursuant to s.
711 1011.60(6), the advertisement shall be in the following form:
712 NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE
713 The ...(name of school district)... will soon consider a
714 measure to increase its property tax levy.
715 Last year's property tax levy:
716 A. Initially proposed tax levy..................$XX,XXX,XXX
717 B. Less tax reductions due to Value Adjustment Board and
718 other assessment
719 changes.............................................($XX,XXX,XXX)
720 C. Actual property tax levy.....................$XX,XXX,XXX
721 This year's proposed tax levy.........................$XX,XXX,XXX
722 A portion of the tax levy is required under state law in
723 order for the school board to receive $...(amount A)... in state
724 education grants. The required portion has ...(increased or
725 decreased)... by ...(amount B)... percent and represents
Page 29 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
726 approximately ...(amount C)... of the total proposed taxes.
727 The remainder of the taxes is proposed solely at the
728 discretion of the school board.
729 All concerned citizens are invited to a public hearing on
730 the tax increase to be held on ...(date and time)... at
731 ...(meeting place)....
732 A DECISION on the proposed tax increase and the budget will
733 be made at this hearing.
734 1. AMOUNT A shall be an estimate, provided by the
735 Department of Education, of the amount to be received in the
736 current fiscal year by the district from state appropriations
737 for the Florida Education Finance Program.
738 2. AMOUNT B shall be the percent increase over the rolled-
739 back rate necessary to levy only the required local effort in
740 the current fiscal year, computed as though in the preceding
741 fiscal year only the required local effort was levied.
742 3. AMOUNT C shall be the quotient of required local-effort
743 millage divided by the total proposed nonvoted millage, rounded
744 to the nearest tenth and stated in words; however, the stated
745 amount shall not exceed nine-tenths.
746 (d) For school districts which have proposed a millage
747 rate in excess of 100 percent of the rolled-back rate computed
748 pursuant to subsection (1) and which propose to levy as nonvoted
749 millage only the minimum amount required pursuant to s.
750 1011.60(6), the advertisement shall be the same as provided in
Page 30 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
751 paragraph (c), except that the second and third paragraphs shall
752 be replaced with the following paragraph:
753 This increase is required under state law in order for the
754 school board to receive $...(amount A)... in state education
755 grants.
756 (e) In all instances in which the provisions of paragraphs
757 (c) and (d) are inapplicable for school districts, the
758 advertisement shall be in the following form:
759 NOTICE OF BUDGET HEARING
760 The ...(name of school district)... will soon consider a
761 budget for ...(fiscal year).... A public hearing to make a
762 DECISION on the budget AND TAXES will be held on ...(date and
763 time)... at ...(meeting place)....
764 (c)(f) In lieu of publishing the notice set out in this
765 subsection, the taxing authority may mail a copy of the notice
766 to each elector residing within the jurisdiction of the taxing
767 authority.
768 (d)(g) In the event that the mailing of the notice of
769 proposed property taxes is delayed beyond September 3 in a
770 county, any multicounty taxing authority which levies ad valorem
771 taxes within that county shall advertise its intention to adopt
772 a tentative budget and millage rate in a newspaper within that
773 county which meets the requirements of chapter 50, as provided
774 in this subsection, and shall hold the hearing required pursuant
775 to paragraph (2)(c) not less than 2 days or more than 5 days
Page 31 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
776 thereafter, and not later than September 18. The advertisement
777 shall be in the following form, unless the proposed millage rate
778 is less than or equal to the rolled-back rate, computed pursuant
779 to subsection (1), in which case the advertisement shall be as
780 provided in paragraph (e):
781 NOTICE OF TAX INCREASE
782 The ...(name of the taxing authority)... proposes to
783 increase its property tax levy by ...(percentage of increase
784 over rolled-back rate)... percent.
785 All concerned citizens are invited to attend a public
786 hearing on the proposed tax increase to be held on ...(date and
787 time)... at ...(meeting place)....
788 (e) The advertisement shall be in the following form, if
789 the proposed millage rate is less than or equal to the rolled-
790 back rate.
791 NOTICE OF BUDGET HEARING
792 The ...(name of taxing authority)... will soon consider a
793 budget for ...(fiscal year).... A public hearing to make a
794 DECISION on the budget AND TAXES will be held on ...(date and
795 time)... at ...(meeting place)....
796 (f)(h) In no event shall any taxing authority add to or
797 delete from the language of the advertisements as specified
798 herein unless expressly authorized by law, except that, if an
799 increase in ad valorem tax rates will affect only a portion of
800 the jurisdiction of a taxing authority, advertisements may
Page 32 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
801 include a map or geographical description of the area to be
802 affected and the proposed use of the tax revenues under
803 consideration. In addition, if published in the print edition of
804 the newspaper, the map must be included in the online
805 advertisement required by s. 50.0211. The advertisements
806 required herein shall not be accompanied, preceded, or followed
807 by other advertising or notices which conflict with or modify
808 the substantive content prescribed herein.
809 (g)(i) The advertisements required pursuant to paragraphs
810 (b) and (e) need not be one-quarter page in size or have a
811 headline in type no smaller than 18 point.
812 (h)(j) The amounts to be published as percentages of
813 increase over the rolled-back rate pursuant to this subsection
814 shall be based on aggregate millage rates and shall exclude
815 voted millage levies unless expressly provided otherwise in this
816 subsection.
817 (i)(k) Any taxing authority which will levy an ad valorem
818 tax for an upcoming budget year but does not levy an ad valorem
819 tax currently shall, in the advertisement specified in paragraph
820 (a) or, paragraph (c), paragraph (d), or paragraph (g), replace
821 the phrase "increase its property tax levy by ...(percentage of
822 increase over rolled-back rate)... percent" with the phrase
823 "impose a new property tax levy of $...(amount)... per $1,000
824 value."
825 (j)(l) Any advertisement required pursuant to this section
Page 33 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
826 shall be accompanied by an adjacent notice meeting the budget
827 summary requirements of s. 129.03(3)(b). Except for those taxing
828 authorities proposing to levy ad valorem taxes for the first
829 time, the following statement shall appear in the budget summary
830 in boldfaced type immediately following the heading, if the
831 applicable percentage is greater than zero:
832 THE PROPOSED OPERATING BUDGET EXPENDITURES OF ...(name of
833 taxing authority)... ARE ...(percent rounded to one decimal
834 place)... MORE THAN LAST YEAR'S TOTAL OPERATING EXPENDITURES.
835 For purposes of this paragraph, "proposed operating budget
836 expenditures" or "operating expenditures" means all moneys of
837 the local government, including dependent special districts,
838 that:
839 1. Were or could be expended during the applicable fiscal
840 year, or
841 2. Were or could be retained as a balance for future
842 spending in the fiscal year.
843
844 Provided, however, those moneys held in or used in trust,
845 agency, or internal service funds, and expenditures of bond
846 proceeds for capital outlay or for advanced refunded debt
847 principal, shall be excluded.
848 (5) In each fiscal year:
849 (a) The maximum millage rate that a county, municipality,
850 special district dependent to a county or municipality,
Page 34 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
851 municipal service taxing unit, or independent special district
852 may levy is a rolled-back rate based on the amount of taxes
853 which would have been levied in the prior year if the maximum
854 millage rate had been applied, adjusted for change in per capita
855 Florida personal income, unless a higher rate was adopted, in
856 which case the maximum is the adopted rate. The maximum millage
857 rate applicable to a county authorized to levy a county public
858 hospital surtax under s. 212.055 and which did so in fiscal year
859 2007 shall exclude the revenues required to be contributed to
860 the county public general hospital in the current fiscal year
861 for the purposes of making the maximum millage rate calculation,
862 but shall be added back to the maximum millage rate allowed
863 after the roll back has been applied, the total of which shall
864 be considered the maximum millage rate for such a county for
865 purposes of this subsection. The revenue required to be
866 contributed to the county public general hospital for the
867 upcoming fiscal year shall be calculated as 11.873 percent times
868 the millage rate levied for countywide purposes in fiscal year
869 2007 times 95 percent of the preliminary tax roll for the
870 upcoming fiscal year. A higher rate may be adopted only under
871 the following conditions:
872 1. A rate of not more than 110 percent of the rolled-back
873 rate based on the previous year's maximum millage rate, adjusted
874 for change in per capita Florida personal income, may be adopted
875 if approved by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the
Page 35 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
876 governing body of the county, municipality, or independent
877 district; or
878 2. A rate in excess of 110 percent may be adopted if
879 approved by a unanimous vote of the membership of the governing
880 body of the county, municipality, or independent district or by
881 a three-fourths vote of the membership of the governing body if
882 the governing body has nine or more members, or if the rate is
883 approved by a referendum.
884 (b) The millage rate of a county or municipality,
885 municipal service taxing unit of a that county, and any special
886 district dependent to a that county or municipality may exceed
887 the maximum millage rate calculated pursuant to this subsection
888 if the total county ad valorem taxes levied or total municipal
889 ad valorem taxes levied do not exceed the maximum total county
890 ad valorem taxes levied or maximum total municipal ad valorem
891 taxes levied respectively. Voted millage and taxes levied by a
892 municipality or independent special district that has levied ad
893 valorem taxes for less than 5 years are not subject to this
894 limitation. The millage rate of a county authorized to levy a
895 county public hospital surtax under s. 212.055 may exceed the
896 maximum millage rate calculated pursuant to this subsection to
897 the extent necessary to account for the revenues required to be
898 contributed to the county public hospital. Total taxes levied
899 may exceed the maximum calculated pursuant to subsection (6) as
900 a result of an increase in taxable value above that certified in
Page 36 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
901 subsection (1) if such increase is less than the percentage
902 amounts contained in subsection (6) or if the administrative
903 adjustment cannot be made because the value adjustment board is
904 still in session at the time the tax roll is extended;
905 otherwise, millage rates subject to this subsection may be
906 reduced so that total taxes levied do not exceed the maximum.
907
908 Any unit of government operating under a home rule charter
909 adopted pursuant to ss. 10, 11, and 24, Art. VIII of the State
910 Constitution of 1885, as preserved by s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the
911 State Constitution, which is granted the authority in the State
912 Constitution to exercise all the powers conferred now or
913 hereafter by general law upon municipalities and which exercises
914 such powers in the unincorporated area shall be recognized as a
915 municipality under this subsection. For a downtown development
916 authority established before the effective date of the State
917 Constitution which has a millage that must be approved by a
918 municipality, the governing body of that municipality shall be
919 considered the governing body of the downtown development
920 authority for purposes of this subsection.
921 (6) Prior to extension of the rolls pursuant to s.
922 193.122, the property appraiser shall notify each taxing
923 authority of the aggregate change in the assessment roll, if
924 any, from that certified pursuant to subsection (1), including,
925 but not limited to, those changes which result from actions by
Page 37 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
926 the value adjustment board or from corrections of errors in the
927 assessment roll. Municipalities, counties, school boards, and
928 water management districts may adjust administratively their
929 adopted millage rate without a public hearing if the taxable
930 value within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority as
931 certified pursuant to subsection (1) is at variance by more than
932 1 percent with the taxable value shown on the roll to be
933 extended. Any other taxing authority may adjust administratively
934 its adopted millage rate without a public hearing if the taxable
935 value within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority as
936 certified pursuant to subsection (1) is at variance by more than
937 3 percent with the taxable value shown on the roll to be
938 extended. The adjustment shall be such that the taxes computed
939 by applying the adopted rate against the certified taxable value
940 are equal to the taxes computed by applying the adjusted adopted
941 rate to the taxable value on the roll to be extended. However,
942 no adjustment shall be made to levies required by law to be a
943 specific millage amount. Not later than 3 days after receipt of
944 notification pursuant to this subsection, each affected taxing
945 authority shall certify to the property appraiser its adjusted
946 adopted rate. Failure to so certify shall constitute waiver of
947 the adjustment privilege.
948 (9) Multicounty taxing authorities are subject to the
949 provisions of this section. The term "taxable value" means the
950 taxable value of all property subject to taxation by the
Page 38 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
951 authority. If a multicounty taxing authority has not received a
952 certification pursuant to subsection (1) from a county by July
953 15, it shall compute its proposed millage rate and rolled-back
954 rate based upon estimates of taxable value supplied by the
955 Department of Revenue. All dates for public hearings and
956 advertisements specified in this section shall, with respect to
957 multicounty taxing authorities, be computed as though
958 certification of value pursuant to subsection (1) were made July
959 1. The multicounty district shall add the following sentence to
960 the advertisement set forth in paragraphs (3)(a) and (d)(g):
961 This tax increase is applicable to ...(name of county or
962 counties)....
963 (10)(a) In addition to the notice required in subsection
964 (3), a district school board shall publish a second notice of
965 intent to levy additional taxes under s. 1011.71(2) or (3). The
966 notice shall specify the projects or number of school buses
967 anticipated to be funded by the additional taxes and shall be
968 published in the size, within the time periods, adjacent to, and
969 in substantial conformity with the advertisement required under
970 subsection (3). The projects shall be listed in priority within
971 each category as follows: construction and remodeling;
972 maintenance, renovation, and repair; motor vehicle purchases;
973 new and replacement equipment; payments for educational
974 facilities and sites due under a lease-purchase agreement;
975 payments for renting and leasing educational facilities and
Page 39 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
976 sites; payments of loans approved pursuant to ss. 1011.14 and
977 1011.15; payment of costs of compliance with environmental
978 statutes and regulations; payment of premiums for property and
979 casualty insurance necessary to insure the educational and
980 ancillary plants of the school district; payment of costs of
981 leasing relocatable educational facilities; and payments to
982 private entities to offset the cost of school buses pursuant to
983 s. 1011.71(2)(i). The additional notice shall be in the
984 following form, except that if the district school board is
985 proposing to levy the same millage under s. 1011.71(2) or (3)
986 which it levied in the prior year, the words "continue to" shall
987 be inserted before the word "impose" in the first sentence, and
988 except that the second sentence of the second paragraph shall be
989 deleted if the district is advertising pursuant to paragraph
990 (3)(e):
991 NOTICE OF TAX FOR SCHOOL
992 CAPITAL OUTLAY
993 The ...(name of school district)... will soon consider a
994 measure to impose a ...(number)... mill property tax for the
995 capital outlay projects listed herein.
996 This tax is in addition to the school board's proposed tax
997 of ...(number)... mills for operating expenses and is proposed
998 solely at the discretion of the school board. THE PROPOSED
999 COMBINED SCHOOL BOARD TAX INCREASE FOR BOTH OPERATING EXPENSES
1000 AND CAPITAL OUTLAY IS SHOWN IN THE ADJACENT NOTICE.
Page 40 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1001 The capital outlay tax will generate approximately
1002 $...(amount)..., to be used for the following projects:
1003 ...(list of capital outlay projects)...
1004 All concerned citizens are invited to a public hearing to
1005 be held on ...(date and time)... at ...(meeting place)....
1006 A DECISION on the proposed CAPITAL OUTLAY TAXES will be
1007 made at this hearing.
1008 (b) In the event a school district needs to amend the list
1009 of capital outlay projects previously advertised and adopted, a
1010 notice of intent to amend the notice of tax for school capital
1011 outlay shall be published in conformity with the advertisement
1012 required in subsection (3). A public hearing to adopt the
1013 amended project list shall be held not less than 2 days nor more
1014 than 5 days after the day the advertisement is first published.
1015 The projects should be listed under each category of new,
1016 amended, or deleted projects in the same order as required in
1017 paragraph (a). The notice shall appear in the following form,
1018 except that any of the categories of new, amended, or deleted
1019 projects may be omitted if not appropriate for the changes
1020 proposed:
1021 AMENDED NOTICE OF TAX FOR
1022 SCHOOL CAPITAL OUTLAY
1023 The School Board of ...(name)... County will soon consider
1024 a measure to amend the use of property tax for the capital
1025 outlay projects previously advertised for the ...(year)... to
Page 41 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1026 ...(year)... school year.
1027 New projects to be funded:
1028 ...(list of capital outlay projects)...
1029 Amended projects to be funded:
1030 ...(list of capital outlay projects)...
1031 Projects to be deleted:
1032 ...(list of capital outlay projects)...
1033 All concerned citizens are invited to a public hearing to
1034 be held on ...(date and time)... at ...(meeting place)....
1035 A DECISION on the proposed amendment to the projects funded
1036 from CAPITAL OUTLAY TAXES will be made at this meeting.
1037 (10)(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph
1038 (2)(b) and s. 200.069(4)(f) to the contrary, the proposed
1039 millage rates provided to the property appraiser by the taxing
1040 authority, except for millage rates adopted by referendum, for
1041 rates authorized by s. 1011.71, and for rates required by law to
1042 be in a specified millage amount, shall be adjusted in the event
1043 that a review notice is issued pursuant to s. 193.1142(4) and
1044 the taxable value on the approved roll is at variance with the
1045 taxable value certified pursuant to subsection (1). The
1046 adjustment shall be made by the property appraiser, who shall
1047 notify the taxing authorities affected by the adjustment within
1048 5 days of the date the roll is approved pursuant to s.
1049 193.1142(4). The adjustment shall be such as to provide for no
1050 change in the dollar amount of taxes levied from that initially
Page 42 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1051 proposed by the taxing authority.
1052 Section 19. Subsection (3) of section 200.069, Florida
1053 Statutes, is amended to read:
1054 200.069 Notice of proposed property taxes and non-ad
1055 valorem assessments.—Pursuant to s. 200.065(2)(b), the property
1056 appraiser, in the name of the taxing authorities and local
1057 governing boards levying non-ad valorem assessments within his
1058 or her jurisdiction and at the expense of the county, shall
1059 prepare and deliver by first-class mail to each taxpayer to be
1060 listed on the current year's assessment roll a notice of
1061 proposed property taxes, which notice shall contain the elements
1062 and use the format provided in the following form.
1063 Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 195.022, no county officer
1064 shall use a form other than that provided herein. The Department
1065 of Revenue may adjust the spacing and placement on the form of
1066 the elements listed in this section as it considers necessary
1067 based on changes in conditions necessitated by various taxing
1068 authorities. If the elements are in the order listed, the
1069 placement of the listed columns may be varied at the discretion
1070 and expense of the property appraiser, and the property
1071 appraiser may use printing technology and devices to complete
1072 the form, the spacing, and the placement of the information in
1073 the columns. In addition, the property appraiser may not include
1074 in the mailing of the notice of ad valorem taxes and non-ad
1075 valorem assessments additional information or items unless such
Page 43 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1076 information or items explain a component of the notice or
1077 provide information directly related to the assessment and
1078 taxation of the property. A county officer may use a form other
1079 than that provided by the department for purposes of this part,
1080 but only if his or her office pays the related expenses and he
1081 or she obtains prior written permission from the executive
1082 director of the department; however, a county officer may not
1083 use a form the substantive content of which is at variance with
1084 the form prescribed by the department. The county officer may
1085 continue to use such an approved form until the law that
1086 specifies the form is amended or repealed or until the officer
1087 receives written disapproval from the executive director.
1088 (3) There shall be under each column heading an entry for
1089 the county; the school district levy required pursuant to s.
1090 1011.60(6); other operating school levies; the municipality or
1091 municipal service taxing unit or units in which the parcel lies,
1092 if any; the water management district levying pursuant to s.
1093 373.503; the independent special districts in which the parcel
1094 lies, if any; and for all voted levies for debt service
1095 applicable to the parcel, if any.
1096 Section 20. Subsection (2) of section 200.071, Florida
1097 Statutes, is amended to read:
1098 200.071 Limitation of millage; counties.—
1099 (2) The board of county commissioners shall, in the event
1100 the sum of the proposed millage for the county and dependent
Page 44 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1101 districts of a county therein is more than the maximum allowed
1102 hereunder, reduce the millage to be levied for county officers,
1103 departments, divisions, commissions, authorities, and dependent
1104 special districts so as not to exceed the maximum millage
1105 provided under this section or s. 200.091.
1106 Section 21. Section 200.091, Florida Statutes, is amended
1107 to read:
1108 200.091 Referendum to increase millage.—The millage
1109 authorized to be levied in s. 200.071 for county purposes,
1110 including dependent districts of a county therein, may be
1111 increased for periods not exceeding 2 years, provided such levy
1112 has been approved by majority vote of the qualified electors in
1113 the county or district voting in a general election, as defined
1114 in s. 97.021, called for such purpose. Such an election may be
1115 called by the governing body of any such county or district on
1116 its own motion and shall be called upon submission of a petition
1117 specifying the amount of millage sought to be levied and the
1118 purpose for which the proceeds will be expended and containing
1119 the signatures of at least 10 percent of the persons qualified
1120 to vote in such election, signed within 60 days prior to the
1121 date the petition is filed.
1122 Section 22. Section 218.67, Florida Statutes, is amended
1123 to read:
1124 218.67 Distribution for fiscally constrained counties.—
1125 (1) Each county that is entirely within a rural area of
Page 45 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1126 opportunity as designated by the Governor pursuant to s.
1127 288.0656 or each county for which the value of a mill will raise
1128 no more than $5 million in revenue, based on the taxable value
1129 certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., from the previous
1130 July 1, shall be considered a fiscally constrained county.
1131 (2) Each fiscally constrained county government that
1132 participates in the local government half-cent sales tax shall
1133 be eligible to receive an additional distribution from the Local
1134 Government Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund, as provided
1135 in s. 202.18(2)(c)1., in addition to its regular monthly
1136 distribution provided under this part and any emergency or
1137 supplemental distribution under s. 218.65.
1138 (3) The amount to be distributed to each fiscally
1139 constrained county shall be determined by the Department of
1140 Revenue at the beginning of the fiscal year, using the prior
1141 fiscal year's July 1 taxable value certified pursuant to s.
1142 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., tax data, population as defined in s. 218.21,
1143 and millage rate levied for the prior fiscal year. The amount
1144 distributed shall be allocated based upon the following factors:
1145 (a) The relative revenue-raising-capacity factor shall be
1146 the ability of the eligible county to generate ad valorem
1147 revenues from 1 mill of taxation on a per capita basis. A county
1148 that raises no more than $25 per capita from 1 mill shall be
1149 assigned a value of 1; a county that raises more than $25 but no
1150 more than $30 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned a value
Page 46 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1151 of 0.75; and a county that raises more than $30 but no more than
1152 $50 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned a value of 0.5. No
1153 value shall be assigned to counties that raise more than $50 per
1154 capita from 1 mill of ad valorem taxation.
1155 (b) The local-effort factor shall be a measure of the
1156 relative level of local effort of the eligible county as
1157 indicated by the millage rate levied for the prior fiscal year.
1158 The local-effort factor shall be the most recently adopted
1159 countywide operating millage rate for each eligible county
1160 multiplied by 0.1.
1161 (c) Each eligible county's proportional allocation of the
1162 total amount available to be distributed to all of the eligible
1163 counties shall be in the same proportion as the sum of the
1164 county's two factors is to the sum of the two factors for all
1165 eligible counties. The counties that are eligible to receive an
1166 allocation under this subsection and the amount available to be
1167 distributed to such counties shall not include counties
1168 participating in the phaseout period under subsection (4) or the
1169 amounts they remain eligible to receive during the phaseout.
1170 (4) For those counties that no longer qualify under the
1171 requirements of subsection (1) after the effective date of this
1172 act, there shall be a 2-year phaseout period. Beginning on July
1173 1 of the year following the year in which the value of a mill
1174 for that county exceeds $5 million in revenue, the county shall
1175 receive two-thirds of the amount received in the prior year, and
Page 47 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1176 beginning on July 1 of the second year following the year in
1177 which the value of a mill for that county exceeds $5 million in
1178 revenue, the county shall receive one-third of the amount
1179 received in the last year that the county qualified as a
1180 fiscally constrained county. Following the 2-year phaseout
1181 period, the county shall no longer be eligible to receive any
1182 distributions under this section unless the county can be
1183 considered a fiscally constrained county as provided in
1184 subsection (1).
1185 (3)(5) The revenues received under this section may be
1186 used by a county for any public purpose, except that such
1187 revenues may not be used to pay debt service on bonds, notes,
1188 certificates of participation, or any other forms of
1189 indebtedness.
1190 Section 23. Subsection (9) of section 259.042, Florida
1191 Statutes, is amended to read:
1192 259.042 Tax increment financing for conservation lands.—
1193 (9) The public bodies and taxing authorities listed in s.
1194 163.387(2)(c), school districts, and special districts that levy
1195 ad valorem taxes within a tax increment area are exempt from
1196 this section.
1197 Section 24. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1198 985.6865, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1199 985.6865 Juvenile detention costs.—
1200 (1) As used in this section, the term:
Page 48 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1201 (b) "Fiscally constrained county" means a county within a
1202 rural area of opportunity as designated by the Governor pursuant
1203 to s. 288.0656 or each county for which the value of a mill will
1204 raise no more than $5 million in revenue, based on the certified
1205 school taxable value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a.,
1206 from the previous July 1.
1207 Section 25. Paragraphs (d) through (m) of subsection (12)
1208 of section 1001.42, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
1209 paragraphs (c) through (n), respectively, and present paragraph
1210 (c) of that subsection is amended, to read:
1211 1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
1212 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
1213 powers and perform all duties listed below:
1214 (12) FINANCE.—Take steps to assure students adequate
1215 educational facilities through the financial procedure
1216 authorized in chapters 1010 and 1011 and as prescribed below:
1217 (c) Tax levies.—Adopt and spread on its minutes a
1218 resolution fixing the district school tax levy, provided for
1219 under s. 9, Art. VII of the State Constitution, necessary to
1220 carry on the school program adopted for the district for the
1221 next ensuing fiscal year as required by law, and fixing the
1222 district bond interest and sinking fund tax levy necessary for
1223 districts against which bonds are outstanding; and adopt and
1224 spread on its minutes a resolution suggesting the tax levy
1225 provided for in s. 9, Art. VII of the State Constitution, found
Page 49 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1226 necessary to carry on the school program adopted for the
1227 district for the next ensuing fiscal year.
1228 Section 26. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (9) and
1229 paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of section 1002.32, Florida
1230 Statutes, are amended to read:
1231 1002.32 Developmental research (laboratory) schools.—
1232 (9) FUNDING.—Funding for a lab school, including a charter
1233 lab school, shall be provided as follows:
1234 (a) Each lab school shall receive state funds for
1235 operating purposes as provided in the Florida Education Finance
1236 Program as defined in s. 1011.61(4) based on the county in which
1237 the lab school is located and as specified in the General
1238 Appropriations Act.
1239 1. The nonvoted required local effort millage established
1240 pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) that would otherwise be required for
1241 lab schools shall be allocated from state funds.
1242 2. An equivalent amount of funds for the operating
1243 discretionary millage authorized pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) shall
1244 be allocated to each lab school through a state-funded
1245 discretionary contribution established pursuant to s.
1246 1011.62(6).
1247 (c) Each lab school shall receive funds for capital
1248 improvement purposes in an amount determined as follows:
1249 multiply the maximum allowable nonvoted discretionary millage
1250 for capital improvements pursuant to s. 1011.71(2) by 96 percent
Page 50 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1251 of the current year's taxable value for school purposes for the
1252 district in which each lab school is located; divide the result
1253 by the total full-time equivalent membership of the district;
1254 and multiply the result by the full-time equivalent membership
1255 of the lab school. The amount obtained shall be discretionary
1256 capital improvement funds and shall be appropriated from state
1257 funds in the General Appropriations Act.
1258 (10) EXCEPTIONS TO LAW.—To encourage innovative practices
1259 and facilitate the mission of the lab schools, in addition to
1260 the exceptions to law specified in s. 1001.23(1), the following
1261 exceptions shall be permitted for lab schools:
1262 (a) The methods and requirements of the following statutes
1263 shall be held in abeyance: ss. 316.75; 1001.30; 1001.31;
1264 1001.32; 1001.33; 1001.34; 1001.35; 1001.36; 1001.361; 1001.362;
1265 1001.363; 1001.37; 1001.371; 1001.372; 1001.38; 1001.39;
1266 1001.395; 1001.40; 1001.41; 1001.44; 1001.453; 1001.46;
1267 1001.461; 1001.462; 1001.463; 1001.464; 1001.47; 1001.48;
1268 1001.49; 1001.50; 1001.51; 1006.12(2); 1006.21(3), (4); 1006.23;
1269 1010.07(2); 1010.40; 1010.41; 1010.42; 1010.43; 1010.44;
1270 1010.45; 1010.46; 1010.47; 1010.48; 1010.49; 1010.50; 1010.51;
1271 1010.52; 1010.53; 1010.54; 1010.55; 1011.02(1), (2), (4)
1272 1011.02(1)-(3), (5); 1011.04; 1011.20; 1011.21; 1011.22;
1273 1011.23; 1011.71; 1011.72; 1011.73; and 1011.74.
1274 Section 27. Paragraph (b) of subsection (17) and
1275 subsection (19) of section 1002.33, Florida Statutes, are
Page 51 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1276 amended to read:
1277 1002.33 Charter schools.—
1278 (17) FUNDING.—Students enrolled in a charter school,
1279 regardless of the sponsorship, shall be funded based upon the
1280 applicable program pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c), the same as
1281 students enrolled in other public schools in a school district.
1282 Funding for a charter lab school shall be as provided in s.
1283 1002.32.
1284 (b)1. Funding for students enrolled in a charter school
1285 sponsored by a school district shall be the sum of the school
1286 district's operating funds from the Florida Education Finance
1287 Program as defined in s. 1011.61(4) and the General
1288 Appropriations Act, including gross state and local funds, and
1289 funds from the school district's current operating discretionary
1290 millage levy; divided by total funded weighted full-time
1291 equivalent students in the school district; and multiplied by
1292 the weighted full-time equivalent students for the charter
1293 school. Charter schools whose students or programs meet the
1294 eligibility criteria in law are entitled to their proportionate
1295 share of categorical program funds included in the total funds
1296 available in the Florida Education Finance Program by the
1297 Legislature, including the student transportation allocation and
1298 the educational enrichment allocation. Total funding for each
1299 charter school shall be recalculated during the year to reflect
1300 the revised calculations under the Florida Education Finance
Page 52 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1301 Program by the state and the actual weighted full-time
1302 equivalent students reported by the charter school during the
1303 full-time equivalent student survey periods designated by the
1304 Commissioner of Education. For charter schools operated by a
1305 not-for-profit or municipal entity, any unrestricted current and
1306 capital assets identified in the charter school's annual
1307 financial audit may be used for other charter schools operated
1308 by the not-for-profit or municipal entity within the school
1309 district. For charter schools operated by a not-for-profit
1310 entity, any unrestricted current or capital assets identified in
1311 the charter school's annual audit may be used for other charter
1312 schools operated by the not-for-profit entity which are located
1313 outside of the originating charter school's school district, but
1314 within the state, through an unforgivable loan that must be
1315 repaid within 5 years to the originating charter school by the
1316 receiving charter school. Unrestricted current assets shall be
1317 used in accordance with s. 1011.62, and any unrestricted capital
1318 assets shall be used in accordance with s. 1013.62(2).
1319 2.a. Funding for students enrolled in a charter school
1320 sponsored by a state university or Florida College System
1321 institution pursuant to paragraph (5)(a) shall be provided in
1322 the Florida Education Finance Program as defined in s.
1323 1011.61(4) and as specified in the General Appropriations Act.
1324 The calculation to determine the amount of state funds includes
1325 the sum of the base Florida Education Finance Program
Page 53 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1326 established in s. 1011.62(1)(n), the discretionary millage
1327 compression supplement established in s. 1011.62(5), and the
1328 state-funded discretionary contribution established in s.
1329 1011.62(6). Charter schools whose students or programs meet the
1330 eligibility criteria in law are entitled to their proportionate
1331 share of categorical program funds included in the total funds
1332 available in the Florida Education Finance Program. The Florida
1333 College System institution or state university sponsoring the
1334 charter school shall be the fiscal agent for these funds, and
1335 all rules of the institution governing the budgeting and
1336 expenditure of state funds shall apply to these funds unless
1337 otherwise provided by law or rule of the State Board of
1338 Education.
1339 (I) The nonvoted required local millage established
1340 pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) that would otherwise be required for
1341 the charter schools shall be allocated from state funds.
1342 (II) An equivalent amount of funds for the operating
1343 discretionary millage authorized pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) shall
1344 be allocated to each charter school through a state-funded
1345 discretionary contribution established pursuant to s.
1346 1011.62(6).
1347 (III) The comparable wage factor as provided in s.
1348 1011.62(2) shall be established as 1.000.
1349 b. Total funding for each charter school shall be
1350 recalculated during the year to reflect the revised calculations
Page 54 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1351 under the Florida Education Finance Program by the state and the
1352 actual weighted full-time equivalent students reported by the
1353 charter school during the full-time equivalent student survey
1354 periods designated by the Commissioner of Education.
1355 c. The Department of Education shall develop a tool that
1356 each state university or Florida College System institution
1357 sponsoring a charter school shall use for purposes of
1358 calculating the funding amount for each eligible charter school
1359 student. The total amount obtained from the calculation must be
1360 appropriated from state funds in the General Appropriations Act
1361 to the charter school.
1362 d. Capital outlay funding for a charter school sponsored
1363 by a state university or Florida College System institution
1364 pursuant to paragraph (5)(a) is determined as follows: multiply
1365 the maximum allowable nonvoted discretionary millage under s.
1366 1011.71(2) by 96 percent of the current year's taxable value for
1367 school purposes for the district in which the charter school is
1368 located; divide the result by the total full-time equivalent
1369 student membership; and multiply the result by the full-time
1370 equivalent student membership of the charter school. The amount
1371 obtained shall be the discretionary capital improvement funds
1372 and shall be appropriated from state funds in the General
1373 Appropriations Act.
1374 (19) CAPITAL OUTLAY FUNDING.—Charter schools sponsored by
1375 a school district are eligible for capital outlay funds pursuant
Page 55 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1376 to ss. 1011.71(2) and 1013.62. Capital outlay funds authorized
1377 in ss. 1011.71(2) and 1013.62 which have been shared with a
1378 charter school-in-the-workplace prior to July 1, 2010, are
1379 deemed to have met the authorized expenditure requirements for
1380 such funds.
1381 Section 28. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1382 1011.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1383 1011.01 Budget system established.—
1384 (3)(a) Each district school board and each Florida College
1385 System institution board of trustees shall prepare, adopt, and
1386 submit to the Commissioner of Education an annual operating
1387 budget. Operating budgets shall be prepared and submitted in
1388 accordance with the provisions of law, rules of the State Board
1389 of Education, and the General Appropriations Act, and for
1390 district school boards in accordance with the provisions of s.
1391 200.065.
1392 Section 29. Subsections (4) and (5) of section 1011.02,
1393 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3) and (4),
1394 respectively, and present subsection (3) of that section is
1395 amended, to read:
1396 1011.02 District school boards to adopt tentative budget.—
1397 (3) The proposed budget shall include an amount for local
1398 required effort for current operation, in accordance with the
1399 requirements of s. 1011.62(4).
1400 Section 30. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 1011.03,
Page 56 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1401 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1402 1011.03 Public hearings; budget to be submitted to
1403 Department of Education.—
1404 (1) Each district school board shall cause a summary of
1405 its tentative budget, including the proposed millage levies as
1406 provided for by law, to be posted on the district's official
1407 website or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s.
1408 50.0311.
1409 (3) The board shall hold public hearings to adopt
1410 tentative and final budgets in the same manner as hearings under
1411 pursuant to s. 200.065. The hearings shall be primarily for the
1412 purpose of hearing requests and complaints from the public
1413 regarding the budgets and the proposed tax levies and for
1414 explaining the budget and proposed or adopted amendments
1415 thereto, if any. The tentative budget must be posted on the
1416 district's official website at least 2 days before the budget
1417 hearing held pursuant to s. 200.065 or other law. The final
1418 adopted budget must be posted on the district's official website
1419 within 30 days after adoption. The board shall require the
1420 superintendent to transmit the adopted budget to the Department
1421 of Education as prescribed by law and rules of the State Board
1422 of Education.
1423 Section 31. Subsections (7) through (15), (17), (18), and
1424 (19) of section 1011.62, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as
1425 subsections (4) through (12), (13), (14), and (15),
Page 57 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1426 respectively, and paragraphs (d) and (h) of subsection (1),
1427 subsections (4), (5), and (6), present subsections (10), (11),
1428 (15), and (16), and paragraph (b) of present subsection (19) of
1429 that section are amended, to read:
1430 1011.62 Funds for operation of schools.—If the annual
1431 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each
1432 district for operation of schools is not determined in the
1433 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing
1434 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as
1435 follows:
1436 (1) COMPUTATION OF THE BASE FLORIDA EDUCATION FINANCE
1437 PROGRAM.—The following procedure shall be followed in
1438 determining the base Florida Education Finance Program funds for
1439 each district:
1440 (d) Funding model for exceptional student education
1441 programs.—The funding model for exceptional student education
1442 programs shall include all of the following:
1443 1. For programs for exceptional students in support levels
1444 IV and V as established in paragraph (c), the funding model
1445 shall include program cost factors.
1446 a. Exceptional education cost factors are determined by
1447 using a matrix of services to document the services that each
1448 support level IV and support level V exceptional student will
1449 receive. The nature and intensity of the services indicated on
1450 the matrix shall be consistent with the services described in
Page 58 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1451 each exceptional student's individual educational plan.
1452 b. In order to generate funds using one of the two
1453 weighted cost factors, a matrix of services must be completed at
1454 the time of the student's initial placement into an exceptional
1455 student education program and at least once every 3 years by
1456 personnel who have received approved training. Nothing listed in
1457 the matrix shall be construed as limiting the services a school
1458 district must provide in order to ensure that exceptional
1459 students are provided a free, appropriate public education.
1460 2. For students identified as exceptional in accordance
1461 with chapter 6A-6, Florida Administrative Code, who do not have
1462 a matrix of services as specified in subparagraph 1. and for
1463 students who are gifted in grades kindergarten through 8, the
1464 funding model shall include the funds generated on the basis of
1465 full-time equivalent student membership in the Florida Education
1466 Finance Program at the same funding level per student as
1467 provided for a basic student and additional funds provided by
1468 the exceptional student education guaranteed allocation
1469 established pursuant to subsection (5) (8).
1470 (h) Small, isolated schools.—Districts that levy the
1471 maximum nonvoted discretionary millage, exclusive of millage for
1472 capital outlay purposes levied pursuant to s. 1011.71(2), may
1473 calculate full-time equivalent students for small, isolated
1474 district-operated schools by multiplying the number of
1475 unweighted full-time equivalent students times 2.75. The
Page 59 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1476 following schools may be considered small, isolated schools
1477 under this paragraph:
1478 1. A high school that is located at least 28 miles by the
1479 shortest route from another high school; has been serving
1480 students primarily in basic studies provided by sub-
1481 subparagraphs (c)1.b. and c. and may include subparagraph (c)4.;
1482 and has a membership of at least 28, but no more than 100,
1483 students in grades 9 through 12; or
1484 2. A district elementary school with a grade configuration
1485 of kindergarten through grade 5, but which may also include
1486 prekindergarten, grade 6, grade 7, or grade 8, that is located
1487 at least 35 miles by the shortest route from another elementary
1488 school within the district; has been serving students primarily
1489 in basic studies provided by sub-subparagraphs (c)1.a. and b.
1490 and may include subparagraph (c)4.; has a student population in
1491 which 75 percent or greater of students are eligible for free
1492 and reduced-price school lunch; and has a membership of at least
1493 28, but no more than 100, students.
1494 (4) COMPUTATION OF DISTRICT REQUIRED LOCAL EFFORT.—The
1495 Legislature shall prescribe the aggregate required local effort
1496 for all school districts collectively as an item in the General
1497 Appropriations Act for each fiscal year. The amount that each
1498 district shall provide annually toward the cost of the Florida
1499 Education Finance Program for kindergarten through grade 12
1500 programs shall be calculated as follows:
Page 60 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1501 (a) Estimated taxable value calculations.—
1502 1.a. Not later than 2 working days before July 19, the
1503 Department of Revenue shall certify to the Commissioner of
1504 Education its most recent estimate of the taxable value for
1505 school purposes in each school district and the total for all
1506 school districts in the state for the current calendar year
1507 based on the latest available data obtained from the local
1508 property appraisers. The value certified shall be the taxable
1509 value for school purposes for that year, and no further
1510 adjustments shall be made, except those made pursuant to
1511 paragraphs (c) and (d), or an assessment roll change required by
1512 final judicial decisions as specified in paragraph (15)(b). Not
1513 later than July 19, the Commissioner of Education shall compute
1514 a millage rate, rounded to the next highest one one-thousandth
1515 of a mill, which, when applied to 96 percent of the estimated
1516 state total taxable value for school purposes, would generate
1517 the prescribed aggregate required local effort for that year for
1518 all districts. The Commissioner of Education shall certify to
1519 each district school board the millage rate, computed as
1520 prescribed in this subparagraph, as the minimum millage rate
1521 necessary to provide the district required local effort for that
1522 year.
1523 b. The General Appropriations Act shall direct the
1524 computation of the statewide adjusted aggregate amount for
1525 required local effort for all school districts collectively from
Page 61 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1526 ad valorem taxes to ensure that no school district's revenue
1527 from required local effort millage will produce more than 90
1528 percent of the district's total Florida Education Finance
1529 Program calculation as calculated and adopted by the
1530 Legislature, and the adjustment of the required local effort
1531 millage rate of each district that produces more than 90 percent
1532 of its total Florida Education Finance Program entitlement to a
1533 level that will produce only 90 percent of its total Florida
1534 Education Finance Program entitlement in the July calculation.
1535 2. On the same date as the certification in sub-
1536 subparagraph 1.a., the Department of Revenue shall certify to
1537 the Commissioner of Education for each district:
1538 a. Each year for which the property appraiser has
1539 certified the taxable value pursuant to s. 193.122(2) or (3), if
1540 applicable, since the prior certification under sub-subparagraph
1541 1.a.
1542 b. For each year identified in sub-subparagraph a., the
1543 taxable value certified by the appraiser pursuant to s.
1544 193.122(2) or (3), if applicable, since the prior certification
1545 under sub-subparagraph 1.a. This is the certification that
1546 reflects all final administrative actions of the value
1547 adjustment board.
1548 (b) Equalization of required local effort.—
1549 1. The Department of Revenue shall include with its
1550 certifications provided pursuant to paragraph (a) its most
Page 62 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1551 recent determination of the assessment level of the prior year's
1552 assessment roll for each county and for the state as a whole.
1553 2. The Commissioner of Education shall adjust the required
1554 local effort millage of each district for the current year,
1555 computed pursuant to paragraph (a), as follows:
1556 a. The equalization factor for the prior year's assessment
1557 roll of each district shall be multiplied by 96 percent of the
1558 taxable value for school purposes shown on that roll and by the
1559 prior year's required local-effort millage, exclusive of any
1560 equalization adjustment made pursuant to this paragraph. The
1561 dollar amount so computed shall be the additional required local
1562 effort for equalization for the current year.
1563 b. Such equalization factor shall be computed as the
1564 quotient of the prior year's assessment level of the state as a
1565 whole divided by the prior year's assessment level of the
1566 county, from which quotient shall be subtracted 1.
1567 c. The dollar amount of additional required local effort
1568 for equalization for each district shall be converted to a
1569 millage rate, based on 96 percent of the current year's taxable
1570 value for that district, and added to the required local effort
1571 millage determined pursuant to paragraph (a).
1572 3. Notwithstanding the limitations imposed pursuant to s.
1573 1011.71(1), the total required local-effort millage, including
1574 additional required local effort for equalization, shall be an
1575 amount not to exceed 10 minus the maximum millage allowed as
Page 63 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1576 nonvoted discretionary millage, exclusive of millage authorized
1577 pursuant to s. 1011.71(2). Nothing herein shall be construed to
1578 allow a millage in excess of that authorized in s. 9, Art. VII
1579 of the State Constitution.
1580 4. For the purposes of this chapter, the term "assessment
1581 level" means the value-weighted mean assessment ratio for the
1582 county or state as a whole, as determined pursuant to s.
1583 195.096, or as subsequently adjusted. However, for those parcels
1584 studied pursuant to s. 195.096(3)(a)1. which are receiving the
1585 assessment limitation set forth in s. 193.155, and for which the
1586 assessed value is less than the just value, the department shall
1587 use the assessed value in the numerator and the denominator of
1588 such assessment ratio. In the event a court has adjudicated that
1589 the department failed to establish an accurate estimate of an
1590 assessment level of a county and recomputation resulting in an
1591 accurate estimate based upon the evidence before the court was
1592 not possible, that county shall be presumed to have an
1593 assessment level equal to that of the state as a whole.
1594 5. If, in the prior year, taxes were levied against an
1595 interim assessment roll pursuant to s. 193.1145, the assessment
1596 level and prior year's nonexempt assessed valuation used for the
1597 purposes of this paragraph shall be those of the interim
1598 assessment roll.
1599 (c) Exclusion.—
1600 1. In those instances in which:
Page 64 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1601 a. There is litigation either attacking the authority of
1602 the property appraiser to include certain property on the tax
1603 assessment roll as taxable property or contesting the assessed
1604 value of certain property on the tax assessment roll, and
1605 b. The assessed value of the property in contest involves
1606 more than 6 percent of the total nonexempt assessment roll, the
1607 plaintiff shall provide to the district school board of the
1608 county in which the property is located and to the Department of
1609 Education a certified copy of the petition and receipt for the
1610 good faith payment at the time they are filed with the court.
1611 2. For purposes of computing the required local effort for
1612 each district affected by such petition, the Department of
1613 Education shall exclude from the district's total nonexempt
1614 assessment roll the assessed value of the property in contest
1615 and shall add the amount of the good faith payment to the
1616 district's required local effort.
1617 (d) Recomputation.—Following final adjudication of any
1618 litigation on the basis of which an adjustment in taxable value
1619 was made pursuant to paragraph (c), the department shall
1620 recompute the required local effort for each district for each
1621 year affected by such adjustments, utilizing taxable values
1622 approved by the court, and shall adjust subsequent allocations
1623 to such districts accordingly.
1624 (e) Prior period funding adjustment millage.—
1625 1. An additional millage to be known as the Prior Period
Page 65 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1626 Funding Adjustment Millage shall be levied by a school district
1627 if the prior period unrealized required local effort funds are
1628 greater than zero. The Commissioner of Education shall calculate
1629 the amount of the prior period unrealized required local effort
1630 funds as specified in subparagraph 2. and the millage required
1631 to generate that amount as specified in this subparagraph. The
1632 Prior Period Funding Adjustment Millage shall be the quotient of
1633 the prior period unrealized required local effort funds divided
1634 by the current year taxable value certified to the Commissioner
1635 of Education pursuant to sub-subparagraph (a)1.a. This levy
1636 shall be in addition to the required local effort millage
1637 certified pursuant to this subsection. Such millage shall not
1638 affect the calculation of the current year's required local
1639 effort, and the funds generated by such levy shall not be
1640 included in the district's Florida Education Finance Program
1641 allocation for that fiscal year. For purposes of the millage to
1642 be included on the Notice of Proposed Taxes, the Commissioner of
1643 Education shall adjust the required local effort millage
1644 computed pursuant to paragraph (a) as adjusted by paragraph (b)
1645 for the current year for any district that levies a Prior Period
1646 Funding Adjustment Millage to include all Prior Period Funding
1647 Adjustment Millage. For the purpose of this paragraph, a Prior
1648 Period Funding Adjustment Millage shall be levied for each year
1649 certified by the Department of Revenue pursuant to sub-
1650 subparagraph (a)2.a. since the previous year certification and
Page 66 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1651 for which the calculation in sub-subparagraph 2.b. is greater
1652 than zero.
1653 2.a. As used in this subparagraph, the term:
1654 (I) "Prior year" means a year certified under sub-
1655 subparagraph (a)2.a.
1656 (II) "Preliminary taxable value" means:
1657 (A) If the prior year is the 2009-2010 fiscal year or
1658 later, the taxable value certified to the Commissioner of
1659 Education pursuant to sub-subparagraph (a)1.a.
1660 (B) If the prior year is the 2008-2009 fiscal year or
1661 earlier, the taxable value certified pursuant to the final
1662 calculation as specified in former paragraph (b) as that
1663 paragraph existed in the prior year.
1664 (III) "Final taxable value" means the district's taxable
1665 value as certified by the property appraiser pursuant to s.
1666 193.122(2) or (3), if applicable. This is the certification that
1667 reflects all final administrative actions of the value
1668 adjustment board.
1669 b. For purposes of this subsection and with respect to
1670 each year certified pursuant to sub-subparagraph (a)2.a., if the
1671 district's prior year preliminary taxable value is greater than
1672 the district's prior year final taxable value, the prior period
1673 unrealized required local effort funds are the difference
1674 between the district's prior year preliminary taxable value and
1675 the district's prior year final taxable value, multiplied by the
Page 67 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1676 prior year district required local effort millage. If the
1677 district's prior year preliminary taxable value is less than the
1678 district's prior year final taxable value, the prior period
1679 unrealized required local effort funds are zero.
1680 c. If a district's prior period unrealized required local
1681 effort funds and prior period district required local effort
1682 millage cannot be determined because such district's final
1683 taxable value has not yet been certified pursuant to s.
1684 193.122(2) or (3), the Prior Period Funding Adjustment Millage
1685 for such fiscal year shall be levied, if not previously levied,
1686 in an amount equal to 75 percent of such district's most recent
1687 unrealized required local effort for which a Prior Period
1688 Funding Adjustment Millage was determined as provided in this
1689 section. Upon certification of the final taxable value in
1690 accordance with s. 193.122(2) or (3) for a tax roll for which a
1691 75 percent Prior Period Funding Adjustment Millage was levied,
1692 the next Prior Period Funding Adjustment Millage shall be
1693 adjusted to include any shortfall or surplus in the prior period
1694 unrealized required local effort funds that would have been
1695 levied, had the district's final taxable value been certified
1696 pursuant to s. 193.122(2) or (3). If this adjustment is made for
1697 a surplus, the reduction in prior period millage may not exceed
1698 the prior period funding adjustment millage calculated pursuant
1699 to subparagraph 1. and sub-subparagraphs a. and b., or pursuant
1700 to this sub-subparagraph, whichever is applicable, and any
Page 68 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1701 additional reduction shall be carried forward to the subsequent
1702 fiscal year.
1703 (5) DISCRETIONARY MILLAGE COMPRESSION SUPPLEMENT.—The
1704 Legislature shall prescribe in the General Appropriations Act,
1705 pursuant to s. 1011.71(1), the rate of nonvoted current
1706 operating discretionary millage that shall be used to calculate
1707 a discretionary millage compression supplement. If the
1708 prescribed millage generates an amount of funds per unweighted
1709 full-time equivalent student for the district that is less than
1710 the state average, the district shall receive an amount per
1711 full-time equivalent student that, when added to the funds per
1712 full-time equivalent student generated by the designated levy,
1713 shall equal the state average. The discretionary millage
1714 compression supplement shall be recalculated during the fiscal
1715 year based on actual full-time equivalent student membership.
1716 (6) STATE-FUNDED DISCRETIONARY CONTRIBUTION.—The state-
1717 funded discretionary contribution is created to fund the
1718 nonvoted discretionary millage for operations pursuant to s.
1719 1011.71(1) and (3) for developmental research schools (lab
1720 schools) established in s. 1002.32, charter schools sponsored by
1721 a Florida College System institution or a state university
1722 pursuant to s. 1002.33(5), and the Florida Virtual School
1723 established in s. 1002.37.
1724 (a) To calculate the state-funded discretionary
1725 contribution for lab schools, multiply the maximum allowable
Page 69 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1726 nonvoted discretionary millage for operations pursuant to s.
1727 1011.71(1) and (3) by the value of 96 percent of the current
1728 year's taxable value for school purposes for the school district
1729 in which the lab school is located; divide the result by the
1730 total full-time equivalent membership of the school district;
1731 and multiply the result by the full-time equivalent membership
1732 of the lab school. The amount obtained shall be appropriated in
1733 the General Appropriations Act.
1734 (b) To calculate the state-funded discretionary
1735 contribution for a charter school sponsored by a Florida College
1736 System institution or a state university and the Florida Virtual
1737 School, multiply the maximum allowable nonvoted discretionary
1738 millage for operations pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) by the
1739 value of 96 percent of the current year's taxable value for
1740 school purposes for the state; divide the result by the total
1741 full-time equivalent membership of the state; and multiply the
1742 result by the full-time equivalent membership of the Florida
1743 Virtual School.
1744 (c) The state-funded discretionary contribution shall be
1745 recalculated during the fiscal year based on actual full-time
1746 equivalent student membership.
1747 (7)(10) FEDERALLY CONNECTED STUDENT SUPPLEMENT.—The
1748 federally connected student supplement is created to provide
1749 supplemental funding for school districts to support the
1750 education of students connected with federally owned military
Page 70 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1751 installations, National Aeronautics and Space Administration
1752 (NASA) real property, and Indian lands. To be eligible for this
1753 supplement, the district must be eligible for federal Impact Aid
1754 Program funds under s. 8003 of Title VIII of the Elementary and
1755 Secondary Education Act of 1965. The supplement shall be
1756 allocated annually to each eligible school district in the
1757 General Appropriations Act. The supplement shall be the sum of
1758 the student allocation and an exempt property allocation.
1759 (a) The supplement student allocation shall be calculated
1760 based on the number of students reported for federal Impact Aid
1761 Program funds, including students with disabilities, who meet
1762 one of the following criteria:
1763 1. The student has a parent who is on active duty in the
1764 uniformed services or is an accredited foreign government
1765 official and military officer. Students with disabilities shall
1766 also be reported separately for this category.
1767 2. The student resides on eligible federally owned Indian
1768 land. Students with disabilities shall also be reported
1769 separately for this category.
1770 3. The student resides with a civilian parent who lives or
1771 works on eligible federal property connected with a military
1772 installation or NASA. The number of these students shall be
1773 multiplied by a factor of 0.5.
1774 (b) The total number of federally connected students
1775 calculated under paragraph (a) shall be multiplied by a
Page 71 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1776 percentage of the base student allocation as provided in the
1777 General Appropriations Act. The total of the number of students
1778 with disabilities as reported separately under subparagraphs
1779 (a)1. and 2. shall be multiplied by an additional percentage of
1780 the base student allocation as provided in the General
1781 Appropriations Act. The base amount and the amount for students
1782 with disabilities shall be summed to provide the student
1783 allocation.
1784 (c) The exempt property allocation shall be equal to the
1785 tax-exempt value of federal impact aid lands reserved as
1786 military installations, real property owned by NASA, or eligible
1787 federally owned Indian lands located in the district, multiplied
1788 by the millage authorized and levied under s. 1011.71(2).
1789 (c)(d) The amount allocated for each eligible school
1790 district shall be recalculated during the year based on actual
1791 full-time equivalent student membership, as amended, from the
1792 most recent February survey and the tax-exempt valuation from
1793 the most recent assessment roll.
1794 (8)(11) QUALITY ASSURANCE GUARANTEE.—The Legislature may
1795 annually in the General Appropriations Act determine a
1796 percentage increase in funds per kindergarten through grade 12
1797 unweighted full-time equivalent student as a minimum guarantee
1798 to each school district. The guarantee shall be calculated from
1799 prior year base funding per unweighted full-time equivalent
1800 student which shall include the adjusted full-time equivalent
Page 72 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1801 dollars as provided in subsection (12) and (15), quality
1802 guarantee funds, and actual nonvoted discretionary local effort
1803 from taxes. From the base funding per unweighted full-time
1804 equivalent student, the increase shall be calculated for the
1805 current year. The current year funds from which the guarantee
1806 shall be determined shall include the adjusted full-time
1807 equivalent dollars as provided in subsection (12) (15) and
1808 potential nonvoted discretionary local effort from taxes. A
1809 comparison of current year funds per unweighted full-time
1810 equivalent student to prior year funds per unweighted full-time
1811 equivalent student shall be computed. For those school districts
1812 which have less than the legislatively assigned percentage
1813 increase, funds shall be provided to guarantee the assigned
1814 percentage increase in funds per unweighted full-time equivalent
1815 student. Should appropriated funds be less than the sum of this
1816 calculated amount for all districts, the commissioner shall
1817 prorate each district's allocation. This provision shall be
1818 implemented to the extent specifically funded.
1819 (12)(15) TOTAL ALLOCATION OF STATE FUNDS TO EACH
1820 DISTRICT.—The total annual state allocation to each district for
1821 current operation for the Florida Education Finance Program
1822 shall be distributed to districts pursuant to s. 1011.66 and
1823 based on the results of the full-time equivalent membership
1824 surveys established in paragraph (1)(a).
1825 (a) When the Florida Education Finance Program allocation
Page 73 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1826 is recalculated, if the gross state Florida Education Finance
1827 Program funds are not sufficient to pay the state requirement in
1828 full, the department shall prorate the available state funds to
1829 each district in the following manner:
1830 1. To calculate the gross state and local Florida
1831 Education Finance Program funding, add the base Florida
1832 Education Finance Program and the categorical funds, except for
1833 the categorical funding provided in subsection (16) and s.
1834 1011.685.
1835 2. To calculate the gross state Florida Education Finance
1836 Program funding, subtract the required local effort in
1837 subsection (4) from the gross and local Florida Education
1838 Finance Program funding.
1839 2.3. To determine the amount that must be prorated among
1840 all school districts, subtract the gross state Florida Education
1841 Finance Program and any prior year adjustments pursuant to
1842 paragraph (b) from the corresponding amount of state funds
1843 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act.
1844 3.4. Each school district's amount of the proration is
1845 calculated based on its proportionate share of the gross state
1846 and local Florida Education Finance Program funding.
1847 (b) The amount thus obtained shall be the net annual
1848 allocation to each school district. However, if it is determined
1849 that any school district received an under allocation or over
1850 allocation for any prior year because of an arithmetical error,
Page 74 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1851 assessment roll change required by final judicial decision,
1852 full-time equivalent student membership error, or any allocation
1853 error revealed in an audit report, the allocation to that
1854 district shall be appropriately adjusted. An under allocation in
1855 a prior year caused by a school district's error may not be the
1856 basis for a positive allocation adjustment for the current year.
1857 If a special program cost factor is less than the basic program
1858 cost factor, an audit adjustment may not result in the
1859 reclassification of the special program FTE to the basic program
1860 FTE. If the Department of Education audit adjustment
1861 recommendation is based upon controverted findings of fact, the
1862 Commissioner of Education is authorized to establish the amount
1863 of the adjustment based on the best interests of the state.
1864 (16) STATE-FUNDED DISCRETIONARY SUPPLEMENT.—
1865 (a) The state-funded discretionary supplement is created
1866 to fund the nonvoted discretionary millage for operations
1867 pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) for students awarded a Family
1868 Empowerment Scholarship in accordance with s. 1002.394. To
1869 calculate the state-funded discretionary supplement for
1870 inclusion in the amount of the scholarship funding:
1871 1. For fiscal year 2023-2024, multiply the maximum
1872 allowable nonvoted discretionary millage for operations pursuant
1873 to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) by the value of 96 percent of the
1874 current year's taxable value for school purposes for the school
1875 district where the student is reported for purposes of the
Page 75 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1876 Florida Education Finance Program as appropriated in the General
1877 Appropriations Act; divide the result by the school district's
1878 total unweighted full-time equivalent membership as appropriated
1879 in the General Appropriations Act; and multiply the result by
1880 the total unweighted full-time equivalent membership associated
1881 with the number of Family Empowerment Scholarship students
1882 included in the school district's total unweighted full-time
1883 equivalent membership. A base amount as specified in the General
1884 Appropriations Act shall be added to this amount for purposes of
1885 calculating the total amount of the supplement.
1886 2. Beginning in fiscal year 2024-2025 and thereafter,
1887 multiply the maximum allowable nonvoted discretionary millage
1888 for operations pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) by the value of
1889 96 percent of the current year's taxable value for school
1890 purposes for the school district where the student is reported
1891 for purposes of the Florida Education Finance Program as
1892 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act; divide the
1893 result by the school district's total unweighted full-time
1894 equivalent membership as appropriated in the General
1895 Appropriations Act; and multiply the result by the total
1896 unweighted full-time equivalent membership associated with the
1897 number of Family Empowerment Scholarship students. The prior
1898 year's base amount shall be adjusted based on changes in the
1899 eligible number of unweighted full-time equivalent membership
1900 associated with the number of Family Empowerment Scholarship
Page 76 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1901 students.
1902 (b) The state-funded discretionary supplement shall be
1903 recalculated during the fiscal year based on actual full-time
1904 equivalent student membership.
1905 (15)(19) EDUCATIONAL ENROLLMENT STABILIZATION PROGRAM.—
1906 (b) The Legislature shall annually appropriate funds in
1907 the General Appropriations Act to the Department of Education
1908 for this program in an amount necessary to maintain a projected
1909 minimum balance of $250 million at the beginning of the upcoming
1910 fiscal year. The Department of Education shall use funds as
1911 appropriated to ensure that based on each recalculation of the
1912 Florida Education Finance Program pursuant to paragraph (1)(a),
1913 a school district's funds per unweighted full-time equivalent
1914 student are not less than the greater of either the school
1915 district's funds per unweighted full-time equivalent student as
1916 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act or the school
1917 district's funds per unweighted full-time equivalent student as
1918 recalculated based upon the receipt of the certified taxable
1919 value for school purposes pursuant to s. 1011.62(4).
1920 Section 32. Subsection (2) of section 1011.69, Florida
1921 Statutes, is amended to read:
1922 1011.69 Equity in School-Level Funding Act.—
1923 (2) District school boards shall allocate to schools
1924 within the district an average of 90 percent of the funds
1925 generated by all schools and guarantee that each school receives
Page 77 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1926 at least 80 percent, except schools participating in the
1927 Principal Autonomy Program Initiative under s. 1011.6202 are
1928 guaranteed to receive at least 90 percent, of the funds
1929 generated by that school based upon the Florida Education
1930 Finance Program as provided in s. 1011.62 and the General
1931 Appropriations Act, including gross state and local funds and,
1932 discretionary lottery funds, and funds from the school
1933 district's current operating discretionary millage levy. Total
1934 funding for each school shall be recalculated during the year to
1935 reflect the revised calculations under the Florida Education
1936 Finance Program by the state and the actual weighted full-time
1937 equivalent students reported by the school during the full-time
1938 equivalent student survey periods designated by the Commissioner
1939 of Education. If the district school board is providing programs
1940 or services to students funded by federal funds, any eligible
1941 students enrolled in the schools in the district shall be
1942 provided federal funds.
1943 Section 33. Section 1011.71, Florida Statutes, is
1944 repealed.
1945 Section 34. Section 1011.715, Florida Statutes, is
1946 repealed.
1947 Section 35. Section 1011.72, Florida Statutes, is
1948 repealed.
1949 Section 36. Section 1011.73, Florida Statutes, is
1950 repealed.
Page 78 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1951 Section 37. Paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (2) and
1952 paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 1013.15, Florida
1953 Statutes, are amended to read:
1954 1013.15 Lease, rental, and lease-purchase of educational
1955 plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary facilities and sites.—
1956 (2)(a) A district school board may rent or lease
1957 educational plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary facilities
1958 and sites as defined in s. 1013.01. Educational plants,
1959 ancillary plants, and auxiliary facilities and sites rented or
1960 leased for 1 year or less shall be funded through the operations
1961 budget or funds derived from millage proceeds pursuant to s.
1962 1011.71(2). A lease contract for 1 year or less, when extended
1963 or renewed beyond a year, becomes a multiple-year lease.
1964 Operational funds or funds derived from millage proceeds
1965 pursuant to s. 1011.71(2) may be authorized to be expended for
1966 multiple-year leases. All leased educational plants, ancillary
1967 plants, and auxiliary facilities and sites must be inspected
1968 before occupancy by the authority having jurisdiction.
1969 1. All newly leased spaces must be inspected and brought
1970 into compliance with the Florida Building Code pursuant to
1971 chapter 553 and the life safety codes pursuant to chapter 633,
1972 before occupancy, using the board's operations budget or funds
1973 derived from millage proceeds pursuant to s. 1011.71(2).
1974 2. Plans for renovation or remodeling of leased space
1975 shall conform to the Florida Building Code and the Florida Fire
Page 79 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
1976 Prevention Code for educational occupancies or other
1977 occupancies, as appropriate and as required in chapters 553 and
1978 633, before occupancy.
1979 3. All leased facilities must be inspected annually for
1980 firesafety deficiencies in accordance with the applicable code
1981 and have corrections made in accordance with s. 1013.12.
1982 Operational funds or funds derived from millage proceeds
1983 pursuant to s. 1011.71(2) may be used to correct deficiencies in
1984 leased space.
1985 4. When the board declares that a public emergency exists,
1986 it may take up to 30 days to bring the leased facility into
1987 compliance with the requirements of State Board of Education
1988 rules.
1989 (c)1. The term of any lease-purchase agreement, including
1990 the initial term and any subsequent renewals, shall not exceed
1991 the useful life of the educational facilities and sites for
1992 which the agreement is made, or 30 years, whichever is less.
1993 2. The initial term or any renewal term of any lease-
1994 purchase agreement shall expire on June 30 of each fiscal year,
1995 but may be automatically renewed annually, subject to a board
1996 making sufficient annual appropriations therefor. Under no
1997 circumstances shall the failure of a board to renew a lease-
1998 purchase agreement constitute a default or require payment of
1999 any penalty or in any way limit the right of a board to purchase
2000 or utilize educational plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary
Page 80 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2001 facilities and sites similar in function to the educational
2002 plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary facilities and sites
2003 that are the subject of the said lease-purchase agreement.
2004 Educational plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary facilities
2005 and sites being acquired pursuant to a lease-purchase agreement
2006 shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation.
2007 3. No lease-purchase agreement entered into pursuant to
2008 this subsection shall constitute a debt, liability, or
2009 obligation of the state or a board or shall be a pledge of the
2010 faith and credit of the state or a board.
2011 4. Any lease-purchase agreement entered into pursuant to
2012 this subsection shall stipulate an annual rate which may consist
2013 of a principal component and an interest component, provided
2014 that the maximum interest rate of any interest component payable
2015 under any such lease-purchase agreement, or any participation or
2016 certificated portion thereof, shall be calculated in accordance
2017 with and be governed by the provisions of s. 215.84.
2018 (4)(a) A board may rent or lease existing buildings, or
2019 space within existing buildings, originally constructed or used
2020 for purposes other than education, for conversion to use as
2021 educational facilities. Such buildings rented or leased for 1
2022 year or less shall be funded through the operations budget or
2023 funds derived from millage pursuant to s. 1011.71(2). A rental
2024 agreement or lease contract for 1 year or less, when extended or
2025 renewed beyond a year, becomes a multiple-year rental or lease.
Page 81 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2026 Operational funds or funds derived from millage proceeds
2027 pursuant to s. 1011.71(2) may be authorized to be expended for
2028 multiple-year rentals or leases. Notwithstanding any other
2029 provisions of this section, if a building was constructed in
2030 conformance with all applicable building and life safety codes,
2031 it shall be deemed to meet the requirements for use and
2032 occupancy as an educational facility subject only to the
2033 provisions of this subsection.
2034 Section 38. Subsections (4) through (7) of section
2035 1013.62, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
2036 through (6), respectively, and subsection (1) and present
2037 subsection (3) of that section are amended, to read:
2038 1013.62 Charter schools capital outlay funding.—
2039 (1) Charter school capital outlay funding shall consist of
2040 state funds when such funds are appropriated in the General
2041 Appropriations Act and revenue resulting from the discretionary
2042 millage authorized in s. 1011.71(2).
2043 (a) To be eligible to receive capital outlay funds, a
2044 charter school must:
2045 1.a. Have been in operation for 2 or more years;
2046 b. Be governed by a governing board established in the
2047 state for 2 or more years which operates both charter schools
2048 and conversion charter schools within the state;
2049 c. Be an expanded feeder chain of a charter school within
2050 the same school district that is currently receiving charter
Page 82 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2051 school capital outlay funds;
2052 d. Have been accredited by a regional accrediting
2053 association as defined by State Board of Education rule;
2054 e. Serve students in facilities that are provided by a
2055 business partner for a charter school-in-the-workplace pursuant
2056 to s. 1002.33(15)(b); or
2057 f. Be operated by a hope operator pursuant to s. 1002.333.
2058 2. Have an annual audit that does not reveal any of the
2059 financial emergency conditions provided in s. 218.503(1) for the
2060 most recent fiscal year for which such audit results are
2061 available.
2062 3. Have not earned two consecutive grades of "F," three
2063 consecutive grades below a "C," or two consecutive school
2064 improvement ratings of "Unsatisfactory."
2065 4. Have received final approval from its sponsor pursuant
2066 to s. 1002.33 for operation during that fiscal year.
2067 5. Serve students in facilities that are not provided by
2068 the charter school's sponsor.
2069 6. Attest in writing to the department that if the charter
2070 school is nonrenewed or terminated, any unencumbered funds and
2071 all equipment and property purchased with public funds shall
2072 revert pursuant to subsection (4) (5).
2073 (b) A charter school is not eligible to receive capital
2074 outlay funds if:
2075 1. It was created by the conversion of a public school and
Page 83 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2076 operates in facilities provided by the charter school's sponsor
2077 for a nominal fee, or at no charge, or if it is directly or
2078 indirectly operated by the school district;
2079 2. It is a developmental research (laboratory) school that
2080 receives state funding for capital improvement purposes pursuant
2081 to s. 1002.32(9)(d);
2082 3. A member of the governing board, or his or her family
2083 member as defined in s. 440.13(1)(b), has an interest in or is
2084 an employee of the lessor, excluding charter schools operating
2085 pursuant to s. 1002.33(15); or
2086 4. It is a Florida College System institution or state
2087 university sponsored charter school that receives state funding
2088 for capital improvement purposes pursuant to s.
2089 1002.33(17)(b)2.d.
2090 (3) If the school board levies the discretionary millage
2091 authorized in s. 1011.71(2), the department shall use the
2092 following calculation methodology to determine the amount of
2093 revenue that a school district must distribute to each eligible
2094 charter school:
2095 (a) Reduce the total discretionary millage revenue by the
2096 school district's annual debt service obligation incurred as of
2097 March 1, 2017, which has not been subsequently retired, and any
2098 amount of participation requirement pursuant to s.
2099 1013.64(2)(a)8. that is being satisfied by revenues raised by
2100 the discretionary millage.
Page 84 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2101 (b) Divide the school district's adjusted discretionary
2102 millage revenue by the district's total capital outlay full-time
2103 equivalent membership and the total number of full-time
2104 equivalent students of each eligible charter school to determine
2105 a capital outlay allocation per full-time equivalent student.
2106 (c) Multiply the capital outlay allocation per full-time
2107 equivalent student by the total number of full-time equivalent
2108 students of each eligible charter school to determine the
2109 capital outlay allocation for each charter school.
2110 (d) If applicable, reduce the capital outlay allocation
2111 identified in paragraph (c) by the total amount of state funds
2112 allocated to each eligible charter school in subsection (2) to
2113 determine the maximum calculated capital outlay allocation. The
2114 amount of funds a school district must distribute to charter
2115 schools shall be as follows:
2116 1. For fiscal year 2023-2024, the amount is 20 percent of
2117 the amount calculated under this paragraph.
2118 2. For fiscal year 2024-2025, the amount is 40 percent of
2119 the amount calculated under this paragraph.
2120 3. For fiscal year 2025-2026, the amount is 60 percent of
2121 the amount calculated under this paragraph.
2122 4. For fiscal year 2026-2027, the amount is 80 percent of
2123 the amount calculated under this paragraph.
2124 5. For fiscal year 2027-2028, and each fiscal year
2125 thereafter, the amount is 100 percent of the amount calculated
Page 85 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2126 under this paragraph.
2127 (e) School districts shall distribute capital outlay funds
2128 to eligible charter schools no later than February 1 of each
2129 year, as required by this subsection, based on the amount of
2130 funds received by the district school board. School districts
2131 shall distribute any remaining capital outlay funds, as required
2132 by this subsection, upon the receipt of such funds until the
2133 total amount calculated pursuant to this subsection is
2134 distributed.
2135
2136 By October 1 of each year, each school district shall certify to
2137 the department the amount of debt service and participation
2138 requirement that complies with the requirement of paragraph (a)
2139 and can be reduced from the total discretionary millage revenue.
2140 The Auditor General shall verify compliance with the
2141 requirements of paragraph (a) and s. 1011.71(2)(e) during
2142 scheduled operational audits of school districts.
2143 Section 39. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 1013.736,
2144 Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2145 1013.736 District Effort Recognition Program.—
2146 (2) ELIGIBILITY.—Annually, the Department of Education
2147 shall determine each district's compliance with the provisions
2148 of s. 1003.03 and determine the district's eligibility to
2149 receive a district effort recognition grant for local school
2150 facilities projects pursuant to this section. Districts shall be
Page 86 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2151 eligible for a district effort recognition grant based upon
2152 participation in any of the following:
2153 (a) The district levies a half-cent school capital outlay
2154 surtax authorized in s. 212.055(6).
2155 (b) The district participates in the levy of the local
2156 government infrastructure sales surtax authorized in s.
2157 212.055(2).
2158 (c) The district levies voted millage for capital outlay
2159 purposes as authorized in s. 9, Art. VII of the State
2160 Constitution.
2161 (3) DISTRICT EFFORT RECOGNITION PROGRAM.—The department
2162 shall annually calculate a district effort amount for each
2163 district by September 1 after each fiscal year. The total amount
2164 of revenue for the prior year from each revenue levied as
2165 described in subsection (2) shall be divided by the number of
2166 months for which revenue was received and multiplied by the
2167 number of authorized months remaining in each voter referendum.
2168 The amount so determined for each revenue levied shall be
2169 totaled. The Department of Revenue shall report the amount of
2170 voter-approved revenue described in paragraphs (2)(a) and (b).
2171 The district shall report the amount of revenue described in
2172 paragraph (2)(b) identified for district fixed capital outlay in
2173 the prior fiscal year. To determine the amount of revenue levied
2174 pursuant to paragraph (2)(c), the district shall annually report
2175 to the Department of Education the outstanding debt service by
Page 87 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2176 bond series and date of maturity. The total of annual debt
2177 service to maturity remaining as of July 1 of each year shall be
2178 added to the other revenues levied pursuant to paragraphs (2)(a)
2179 and (b) in determining the total district effort amount. Only
2180 the amount of voter-approved revenue described in paragraph
2181 (2)(b) which has been identified for district fixed capital
2182 outlay from the prior fiscal year shall be used in the
2183 calculation.
2184 Section 40. Section 1011.19, Florida Statutes, is amended
2185 to read:
2186 1011.19 Sources of district school fund.—The district
2187 school fund shall consist of funds derived from the district
2188 school tax levy; state appropriations; appropriations by county
2189 commissioners; local, state, and federal school food service
2190 funds; any and all other sources for school purposes; national
2191 forest trust funds and other federal sources; and gifts and
2192 other sources.
2193 Section 41. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
2194 192.0105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2195 192.0105 Taxpayer rights.—There is created a Florida
2196 Taxpayer's Bill of Rights for property taxes and assessments to
2197 guarantee that the rights, privacy, and property of the
2198 taxpayers of this state are adequately safeguarded and protected
2199 during tax levy, assessment, collection, and enforcement
2200 processes administered under the revenue laws of this state. The
Page 88 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2201 Taxpayer's Bill of Rights compiles, in one document, brief but
2202 comprehensive statements that summarize the rights and
2203 obligations of the property appraisers, tax collectors, clerks
2204 of the court, local governing boards, the Department of Revenue,
2205 and taxpayers. Additional rights afforded to payors of taxes and
2206 assessments imposed under the revenue laws of this state are
2207 provided in s. 213.015. The rights afforded taxpayers to assure
2208 that their privacy and property are safeguarded and protected
2209 during tax levy, assessment, and collection are available only
2210 insofar as they are implemented in other parts of the Florida
2211 Statutes or rules of the Department of Revenue. The rights so
2212 guaranteed to state taxpayers in the Florida Statutes and the
2213 departmental rules include:
2214 (1) THE RIGHT TO KNOW.—
2215 (a) The right to be sent a notice of proposed property
2216 taxes and proposed or adopted non-ad valorem assessments (see
2217 ss. 194.011(1), 200.065(2)(b) and (d) and (12)(a) (13)(a), and
2218 200.069). The notice must also inform the taxpayer that the
2219 final tax bill may contain additional non-ad valorem assessments
2220 (see s. 200.069(9)).
2221
2222 Notwithstanding the right to information contained in this
2223 subsection, under s. 197.122 property owners are held to know
2224 that property taxes are due and payable annually and are charged
2225 with a duty to ascertain the amount of current and delinquent
Page 89 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2226 taxes and obtain the necessary information from the applicable
2227 governmental officials.
2228 Section 42. Subsection (5) of section 193.1142, Florida
2229 Statutes, is amended to read:
2230 193.1142 Approval of assessment rolls.—
2231 (5) Whenever an assessment roll submitted to the
2232 department is returned to the property appraiser for additional
2233 evaluation, a review notice shall be issued for the express
2234 purpose of the adjustment provided in s. 200.065(10) s.
2235 200.065(11).
2236 Section 43. Subsection (3) of section 197.363, Florida
2237 Statutes, is amended to read:
2238 197.363 Special assessments and service charges; optional
2239 method of collection.—
2240 (3) When collected by using the method provided for ad
2241 valorem taxes, special assessments shall be subject to all
2242 collection provisions of this chapter, including provisions
2243 relating to discount for early payment, prepayment by
2244 installment method, penalty for delinquent payment, and issuance
2245 of tax certificates and tax deeds for nonpayment, and shall also
2246 be subject to the provisions of s. 192.091(2)(b) s.
2247 192.091(2)(b)2.
2248 Section 44. Paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section
2249 197.3632, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2250 197.3632 Uniform method for the levy, collection, and
Page 90 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2251 enforcement of non-ad valorem assessments.—
2252 (8)
2253 (c) Non-ad valorem assessments shall also be subject to
2254 the provisions of s. 192.091(2) s. 192.091(2)(b), or the tax
2255 collector at his or her option shall be compensated for the
2256 collection of non-ad valorem assessments based on the actual
2257 cost of collection, whichever is greater. However, a municipal
2258 or county government shall only compensate the tax collector for
2259 the actual cost of collecting non-ad valorem assessments.
2260 Section 45. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) and paragraph
2261 (c) of subsection (6) of section 212.055, Florida Statutes, are
2262 amended to read:
2263 212.055 Discretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent;
2264 authorization and use of proceeds.—It is the legislative intent
2265 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales
2266 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a
2267 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the
2268 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties
2269 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the
2270 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the
2271 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if
2272 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended;
2273 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide.
2274 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as
2275 provided in s. 212.054.
Page 91 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2276 (2) LOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.—
2277 (d) The proceeds of the surtax authorized by this
2278 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the
2279 school district, within the county and municipalities within the
2280 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement,
2281 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct
2282 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public
2283 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or
2284 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting
2285 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of
2286 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to
2287 residential or commercial property owners who make energy
2288 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial
2289 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use
2290 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county-
2291 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been
2292 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department
2293 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest
2294 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is
2295 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the
2296 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county
2297 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required
2298 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long-
2299 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure.
2300 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in
Page 92 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2301 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service
2302 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for
2303 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to
2304 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for
2305 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for
2306 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified.
2307 1. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term
2308 "infrastructure" means:
2309 a. Any fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay
2310 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement
2311 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more
2312 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design,
2313 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related
2314 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For
2315 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term "public facilities"
2316 means facilities as defined in s. 163.3164(41), s. 163.3221(13),
2317 or s. 189.012(5), and includes facilities that are necessary to
2318 carry out governmental purposes, including, but not limited to,
2319 fire stations, general governmental office buildings, and animal
2320 shelters, regardless of whether the facilities are owned by the
2321 local taxing authority or another governmental entity.
2322 b. A fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service
2323 vehicle, a sheriff's office vehicle, a police department
2324 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to
2325 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a
Page 93 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2326 life expectancy of at least 5 years.
2327 c. Any expenditure for the construction, lease, or
2328 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for,
2329 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008.
2330 d. Any fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay
2331 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have
2332 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees
2333 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a
2334 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area
2335 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially
2336 declared by the state or by the local government under s.
2337 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to
2338 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation
2339 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the
2340 local government providing the improvement funding to make the
2341 private facility available to the public for purposes of
2342 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a
2343 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with
2344 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any
2345 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period.
2346 e. Any land acquisition expenditure for a residential
2347 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are
2348 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual
2349 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median
2350 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a
Page 94 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2351 local government or by a special district that enters into a
2352 written agreement with the local government to provide such
2353 housing. The local government or special district may enter into
2354 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for
2355 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the
2356 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this
2357 sub-subparagraph.
2358 f. Instructional technology used solely in a school
2359 district's classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the
2360 term "instructional technology" means an interactive device that
2361 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students
2362 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the
2363 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in
2364 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be
2365 affixed to the facilities.
2366 2. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "energy
2367 efficiency improvement" means any energy conservation and
2368 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through
2369 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural
2370 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property,
2371 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of
2372 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling,
2373 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building
2374 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade;
2375 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or
Page 95 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2376 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle
2377 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel
2378 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient
2379 lighting equipment.
2380 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection,
2381 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended
2382 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax
2383 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the county's
2384 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development
2385 projects having a general public purpose of improving local
2386 economies, including the funding of operational costs and
2387 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement
2388 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the
2389 authority of this subparagraph.
2390 4. Surtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter
2391 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such
2392 schools based on each school's proportionate share of total
2393 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment
2394 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in
2395 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter
2396 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided
2397 in s. 1013.62(3) s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures
2398 shall be accounted for in a charter school's monthly or
2399 quarterly financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a
2400 school's charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school
Page 96 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2401 is dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school
2402 was organized, any unencumbered funds received under this
2403 paragraph shall revert to the sponsor.
2404 (6) SCHOOL CAPITAL OUTLAY SURTAX.—
2405 (c) The resolution providing for the imposition of the
2406 surtax must set forth a plan for use of the surtax proceeds for
2407 fixed capital expenditures or fixed capital costs associated
2408 with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of school
2409 facilities and campuses which have a useful life expectancy of 5
2410 or more years, and any land acquisition, land improvement,
2411 design, and engineering costs related thereto, or any purchase,
2412 lease-purchase, lease, or maintenance of school buses, as
2413 defined in s. 1006.25, which have a life expectancy of 5 years
2414 or more. Additionally, the plan shall include the costs of
2415 retrofitting and providing for technology implementation,
2416 including hardware and software, for the various sites within
2417 the school district. Surtax revenues may be used to service bond
2418 indebtedness to finance projects authorized by this subsection,
2419 and any interest accrued thereto may be held in trust to finance
2420 such projects. Neither the proceeds of the surtax nor any
2421 interest accrued thereto shall be used for operational expenses.
2422 Surtax revenues shared with charter schools shall be shared
2423 based on their proportionate share of total school district
2424 capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment as adopted by the
2425 education estimating conference established in s. 216.136 and
Page 97 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2426 expended by the charter school in a manner consistent with the
2427 allowable uses set forth in s. 1013.62(3) s. 1013.62(4). All
2428 revenues and expenditures shall be accounted for in a charter
2429 school's monthly or quarterly financial statement pursuant to s.
2430 1002.33(9). The eligibility of a charter school to receive funds
2431 under this subsection shall be determined in accordance with s.
2432 1013.62(1). If a school's charter is not renewed or is
2433 terminated and the school is dissolved under the provisions of
2434 law under which the school was organized, any unencumbered funds
2435 received under this subsection shall revert to the sponsor.
2436 Section 46. Subsection (3) of section 218.63, Florida
2437 Statutes, is amended to read:
2438 218.63 Participation requirements.—
2439 (3) A county or municipality may not participate in the
2440 distribution of local government half-cent sales tax revenues
2441 during the 12 months following a determination of noncompliance
2442 by the Department of Revenue as provided in s. 200.065(12)(e) s.
2443 200.065(13)(e).
2444 Section 47. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (3) of
2445 section 373.536, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2446 373.536 District budget and hearing thereon.—
2447 (3) BUDGET HEARINGS AND WORKSHOPS; NOTICE.—
2448 (c) The tentative budget shall be adopted in accordance
2449 with the provisions of s. 200.065; however, if the mailing of
2450 the notice of proposed property taxes is delayed beyond
Page 98 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2451 September 3 in any county in which the district lies, the
2452 district shall advertise its intention to adopt a tentative
2453 budget and millage rate, pursuant to s. 200.065(3)(d) s.
2454 200.065(3)(g), in a newspaper of general paid circulation in
2455 that county.
2456 (d) As provided in s. 200.065(2)(d), the board shall
2457 publish one or more notices of its intention to adopt a final
2458 budget for the district for the ensuing fiscal year. The notice
2459 shall appear adjacent to an advertisement that sets forth the
2460 tentative budget in a format meeting the budget summary
2461 requirements of s. 129.03(3)(b). The district shall not include
2462 expenditures of federal special revenues and state special
2463 revenues when preparing the statement required by s.
2464 200.065(3)(j) s. 200.065(3)(l). The notice and advertisement
2465 shall be published in one or more newspapers having a combined
2466 general paid circulation in each county in which the district
2467 lies. Districts may include explanatory phrases and examples in
2468 budget advertisements published under s. 200.065 to clarify or
2469 illustrate the effect that the district budget may have on ad
2470 valorem taxes.
2471 Section 48. Subsection (6) of section 402.22, Florida
2472 Statutes, is amended to read:
2473 402.22 Education program for students who reside in
2474 residential care facilities operated by the Department of
2475 Children and Families or the Agency for Persons with
Page 99 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2476 Disabilities.—
2477 (6) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 1001.42(4)(m),
2478 the educational program at the Marianna Sunland Center in
2479 Jackson County shall be operated by the Department of Education,
2480 either directly or through grants or contractual agreements with
2481 other public educational agencies. The annual state allocation
2482 to any such agency shall be computed pursuant to s. 101.62(1),
2483 (2), and (14) s. 1011.62(1), (2), and (18) and allocated in the
2484 amount that would have been provided the local school district
2485 in which the residential facility is located.
2486 Section 49. Paragraph (f) of subsection (3) of section
2487 1002.37, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2488 1002.37 The Florida Virtual School.—
2489 (3) Funding for the Florida Virtual School shall be
2490 provided as follows:
2491 (f) The Florida Virtual School shall receive state funds
2492 for operating purposes as provided in the General Appropriations
2493 Act. The calculation to determine the amount of state funds
2494 includes: the sum of the basic amount for current operations
2495 established in s. 1011.62(1)(n), the discretionary millage
2496 compression supplement established in s. 1011.62(5), the state-
2497 funded discretionary contribution established in s. 1011.62(6),
2498 a per-full-time equivalent share of the exceptional student
2499 education guaranteed allocation established in s. 1011.62(5) s.
2500 1011.62(8), and the mental health assistance allocation
Page 100 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2501 established in s. 1011.62(10) s. 1011.62(13).
2502 Section 50. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (12) of
2503 section 1002.394, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2504 1002.394 The Family Empowerment Scholarship Program.—
2505 (12) SCHOLARSHIP FUNDING AND PAYMENT.—
2506 (a)1. The calculated scholarship amount for a
2507 participating student determined eligible pursuant to paragraph
2508 (3)(a) shall be based upon the grade level and school district
2509 in which the student was assigned as 100 percent of the funds
2510 per unweighted full-time equivalent in the Florida Education
2511 Finance Program for a student in the basic program established
2512 pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c)1., plus a per-full-time equivalent
2513 share of funds for the categorical programs established in s.
2514 1011.62(4)(a) s. 1011.62(5), (7)(a), and (16), as funded in the
2515 General Appropriations Act.
2516 2.a. For renewing scholarship students, the organization
2517 must verify the student's continued eligibility to participate
2518 in the scholarship program at least 30 days before each payment.
2519 Upon receiving the verified list of eligible scholarship
2520 students, the department shall release, from state funds only,
2521 the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the
2522 organization for deposit into the student's account in quarterly
2523 payments no later than August 1, November 1, February 1, and
2524 April 1 of each school year in which the scholarship is in
2525 force.
Page 101 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2526 b. For new scholarship students, the organization must
2527 verify the student's eligibility to participate in the
2528 scholarship program at least 30 days before each payment. Upon
2529 receiving the verified list of eligible scholarship students,
2530 the department shall release, from state funds only, the amount
2531 calculated pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the organization for
2532 deposit into the student's account in quarterly payments no
2533 later than September 1, November 1, February 1, and April 1 of
2534 each school year in which the scholarship is in force. For a
2535 student exiting a Department of Juvenile Justice commitment
2536 program who chooses to participate in the scholarship program,
2537 the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph 1. must be
2538 transferred from the school district in which the student last
2539 attended a public school before commitment to the Department of
2540 Juvenile Justice.
2541 c. The department is authorized to release the state funds
2542 contingent upon verification that the organization will comply
2543 with s. 1002.395(6)(l) based upon the organization's submitted
2544 verified list of eligible scholarship students pursuant to s.
2545 1002.395.
2546 3. The initial payment shall be made after the
2547 organization's verification of admission acceptance, and
2548 subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of continued
2549 enrollment and attendance at the participating private school.
2550 Payments for tuition and fees for full-time enrollment shall be
Page 102 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2551 made within 7 business days after approval by the parent
2552 pursuant to paragraph (10)(a) and the private school pursuant to
2553 paragraph (9)(b). Payment must be by funds transfer or any other
2554 means of payment that the department deems to be commercially
2555 viable or cost-effective. An organization shall ensure that the
2556 parent has approved a funds transfer before any scholarship
2557 funds are deposited.
2558 4. An organization may not transfer any funds to an
2559 account of a student determined eligible pursuant to paragraph
2560 (3)(a) which has a balance in excess of $24,000.
2561 (b)1. For the 2024-2025 school year, the maximum number of
2562 scholarships funded under paragraph (3)(b) shall be 72,615.
2563 Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, the maximum number of
2564 scholarships funded under paragraph (3)(b) shall annually
2565 increase by 5 percent of the state's total exceptional student
2566 education full-time equivalent student membership, not including
2567 gifted students. The maximum number of scholarships funded shall
2568 increase by 1 percent of the state's total exceptional student
2569 education full-time equivalent student membership, not including
2570 gifted students, in the school year following any school year in
2571 which the number of scholarships funded exceeds 95 percent of
2572 the number of available scholarships for that school year. An
2573 eligible student who meets any of the following requirements
2574 shall be excluded from the maximum number of students if the
2575 student:
Page 103 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2576 a. Received specialized instructional services under the
2577 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program pursuant to s.
2578 1002.66 during the previous school year and the student has a
2579 current IEP developed by the district school board in accordance
2580 with rules of the State Board of Education;
2581 b. Is a dependent child of a law enforcement officer or a
2582 member of the United States Armed Forces, a foster child, or an
2583 adopted child; or
2584 c. Spent the prior school year in attendance at a Florida
2585 public school or the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind.
2586 For purposes of this subparagraph, the term "prior school year
2587 in attendance" means that the student was enrolled and reported
2588 by:
2589 (I) A school district for funding during either the
2590 preceding October or February full-time equivalent student
2591 membership surveys in kindergarten through grade 12, which
2592 includes time spent in a Department of Juvenile Justice
2593 commitment program if funded under the Florida Education Finance
2594 Program;
2595 (II) The Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind during
2596 the preceding October or February full-time equivalent student
2597 membership surveys in kindergarten through grade 12;
2598 (III) A school district for funding during the preceding
2599 October or February full-time equivalent student membership
2600 surveys, was at least 4 years of age when enrolled and reported,
Page 104 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2601 and was eligible for services under s. 1003.21(1)(e); or
2602 (IV) Received a John M. McKay Scholarship for Students
2603 with Disabilities in the 2021-2022 school year.
2604 2. For a student who has a Level I to Level III matrix of
2605 services or a diagnosis by a physician or psychologist, the
2606 calculated scholarship amount for a student participating in the
2607 program must be based upon the grade level and school district
2608 in which the student would have been enrolled as the total funds
2609 per unweighted full-time equivalent in the Florida Education
2610 Finance Program for a student in the basic exceptional student
2611 education program pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c) and (d), plus a
2612 per full-time equivalent share of funds for the categorical
2613 programs established in s. 1011.62(4)(a) and (5) s. 1011.62(5),
2614 (7)(a), (8), and (16), as funded in the General Appropriations
2615 Act. For the categorical program established in s. 1011.62(5) s.
2616 1011.62(8), the funds must be allocated based on the school
2617 district's average exceptional student education guaranteed
2618 allocation funds per exceptional student education full-time
2619 equivalent student.
2620 3. For a student with a Level IV or Level V matrix of
2621 services, the calculated scholarship amount must be based upon
2622 the school district to which the student would have been
2623 assigned as the total funds per full-time equivalent for the
2624 Level IV or Level V exceptional student education program
2625 pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c)2.a. or b., plus a per-full time
Page 105 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2626 equivalent share of funds for the categorical programs
2627 established in s. 1011.62(4)(a) s. 1011.62(5), (7)(a), and (16),
2628 as funded in the General Appropriations Act.
2629 4. For a student who received a Gardiner Scholarship
2630 pursuant to former s. 1002.385 in the 2020-2021 school year, the
2631 amount shall be the greater of the amount calculated pursuant to
2632 subparagraph 2. or the amount the student received for the 2020-
2633 2021 school year.
2634 5. For a student who received a John M. McKay Scholarship
2635 pursuant to former s. 1002.39 in the 2020-2021 school year, the
2636 amount shall be the greater of the amount calculated pursuant to
2637 subparagraph 2. or the amount the student received for the 2020-
2638 2021 school year.
2639 6. The organization must verify the student's eligibility
2640 to participate in the scholarship program at least 30 days
2641 before each payment.
2642 7.a. For renewing scholarship students, upon receiving the
2643 verified list of eligible scholarship students, the department
2644 shall release, from state funds only, the amount calculated
2645 pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the organization for deposit into
2646 the student's account in quarterly payments no later than August
2647 1, November 1, February 1, and April 1 of each school year in
2648 which the scholarship is in force.
2649 b. For new scholarship students, upon receiving the
2650 verified list of eligible scholarship students, the department
Page 106 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2651 shall release, from state funds only, the amount calculated
2652 pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the organization for deposit into
2653 the student's account in quarterly payments no later than
2654 September 1, November 1, February 1, and April 1 of each school
2655 year in which the scholarship is in force.
2656 8. If a scholarship student is attending an eligible
2657 private school full time, the initial payment shall be made
2658 after the organization's verification of admission acceptance,
2659 and subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of
2660 continued enrollment and attendance at the eligible private
2661 school. Payments for tuition and fees for full-time enrollment
2662 shall be made within 7 business days after approval by the
2663 parent pursuant to paragraph (10)(b) and the private school
2664 pursuant to paragraph (9)(b).
2665 9. Accrued interest in the student's account is in
2666 addition to, and not part of, the awarded funds. Program funds
2667 include both the awarded funds and accrued interest.
2668 10. The organization may develop a system for payment of
2669 benefits by funds transfer, including, but not limited to, debit
2670 cards, electronic payment cards, or any other means of payment
2671 which the department deems to be commercially viable or cost-
2672 effective. A student's scholarship award may not be reduced for
2673 debit card or electronic payment fees. Commodities or services
2674 related to the development of such a system must be procured by
2675 competitive solicitation unless they are purchased from a state
Page 107 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2676 term contract pursuant to s. 287.056.
2677 11. An organization may not transfer any funds to an
2678 account of a student determined to be eligible pursuant to
2679 paragraph (3)(b) which has a balance in excess of $50,000.
2680 12. Moneys received pursuant to this section do not
2681 constitute taxable income to the qualified student or the parent
2682 of the qualified student.
2683 Section 51. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
2684 1002.45, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2685 1002.45 Virtual instruction programs.—
2686 (6) VIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM AND VIRTUAL CHARTER SCHOOL
2687 FUNDING.—
2688 (b) Students enrolled in a virtual instruction program
2689 shall be funded in the Florida Education Finance Program as
2690 provided in the General Appropriations Act. The calculation to
2691 determine the amount of funds for each student through the
2692 Florida Education Finance Program shall include the sum of the
2693 basic amount for current operations established in s.
2694 1011.62(1)(n) and all categorical programs except for the
2695 categorical programs established in ss. 1011.62(4) and (9),
2696 1011.68, and 1011.685 ss. 1011.62(7), (12), and (16), 1011.68,
2697 and 1011.685. Students residing outside of the school district
2698 reporting the full-time equivalent virtual student shall be
2699 funded from state funds only.
2700 Section 52. Subsections (2) through (5) of section
Page 108 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2701 1003.4203, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2702 1003.4203 Digital materials, CAPE Digital Tool
2703 certificates, CAPE industry certifications, and technical
2704 assistance.—
2705 (2) CAPE DIGITAL TOOL CERTIFICATES.—The department shall
2706 identify, in the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List under
2707 ss. 1003.492 and 1008.44, CAPE Digital Tool certificates that
2708 indicate a student's digital skills. The department shall notify
2709 each school district when the certificates are available. The
2710 certificates shall be made available to all public elementary
2711 grades students. Targeted skills to be mastered for the
2712 certificate include digital skills that are necessary to the
2713 student's academic work and skills the student may need in
2714 future employment. CAPE Digital Tool certificates earned by
2715 students are eligible for additional funding pursuant to s.
2716 1011.62(13) s. 1011.62(17).
2717 (3) BASIC CAPE INDUSTRY CERTIFICATIONS.—
2718 (a) CAPE industry certifications, issued to middle school
2719 and high school students, which do not articulate for college
2720 credit, are eligible for additional funding pursuant to s.
2721 1011.62(13) s. 1011.62(17). Each approved industry certification
2722 must be specifically identified in the CAPE Industry
2723 Certification Funding List as a CAPE Basic Non-articulated
2724 industry certification.
2725 (b) CAPE industry certifications, issued to high school
Page 109 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2726 students, which articulate for college credit, are eligible for
2727 additional funding pursuant to s. 1011.62(13) s. 1011.62(17).
2728 Each approved industry certification must be specifically
2729 identified in the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List as a
2730 CAPE Basic Articulated industry certification.
2731 (4) CAPE ACCELERATION.—Industry certifications that
2732 articulate for 15 or more college credit hours and, if
2733 successfully completed, are eligible for additional funding
2734 pursuant to s. 1011.62(13) s. 1011.62(17). Each approved
2735 industry certification must be specifically identified in the
2736 CAPE Industry Certification Funding List as a CAPE Acceleration
2737 industry certification.
2738 (5) CAPE PATHWAYS.—Industry certifications issued to high
2739 school students who complete at least three courses and an
2740 industry certification in a single career and technical
2741 education program or program of study and who exit with a
2742 standard high school diploma are eligible for additional funding
2743 pursuant to s. 1011.62(13) s. 1011.62(17). Each approved
2744 industry certification must be specifically identified in the
2745 CAPE Industry Certification Funding List as a CAPE Pathways
2746 industry certification.
2747 Section 53. Subsection (3) of section 1003.4935, Florida
2748 Statutes, is amended to read:
2749 1003.4935 Middle grades career and professional academy
2750 courses and career-themed courses.—
Page 110 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2751 (3) CAPE industry certifications offered in the middle
2752 grades that are included on the CAPE Industry Certification
2753 Funding List, if earned by students, are eligible for additional
2754 funding pursuant to s. 1011.62(13) s. 1011.62(17).
2755 Section 54. Section 1006.12, Florida Statutes, is amended
2756 to read:
2757 1006.12 Safe-school officers at each public school.—For
2758 the protection and safety of school personnel, property,
2759 students, and visitors, each district school board and school
2760 district superintendent shall partner with law enforcement
2761 agencies or security agencies to establish or assign one or more
2762 safe-school officers at each school facility within the
2763 district, including charter schools. A district school board
2764 must collaborate with charter school governing boards to
2765 facilitate charter school access to all safe-school officer
2766 options available under this section. The school district may
2767 implement any combination of the options in subsections (1)-(4)
2768 to best meet the needs of the school district and charter
2769 schools.
2770 (1) SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER.—A school district may
2771 establish school resource officer programs through a cooperative
2772 agreement with law enforcement agencies.
2773 (a) School resource officers shall undergo criminal
2774 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation
2775 and be certified law enforcement officers, as defined in s.
Page 111 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2776 943.10(1), who are employed by a law enforcement agency as
2777 defined in s. 943.10(4). The powers and duties of a law
2778 enforcement officer shall continue throughout the employee's
2779 tenure as a school resource officer.
2780 (b) School resource officers shall abide by district
2781 school board policies and shall consult with and coordinate
2782 activities through the school principal, but shall be
2783 responsible to the law enforcement agency in all matters
2784 relating to employment, subject to agreements between a district
2785 school board and a law enforcement agency. The agreements shall
2786 identify the entity responsible for maintaining records relating
2787 to training. Activities conducted by the school resource officer
2788 which are part of the regular instructional program of the
2789 school shall be under the direction of the school principal.
2790 (2) SCHOOL SAFETY OFFICER.—A school district may
2791 commission one or more school safety officers for the protection
2792 and safety of school personnel, property, and students within
2793 the school district. The district school superintendent may
2794 recommend, and the district school board may appoint, one or
2795 more school safety officers.
2796 (a) School safety officers shall undergo criminal
2797 background checks, drug testing, and a psychological evaluation
2798 and be law enforcement officers, as defined in s. 943.10(1),
2799 certified under chapter 943 and employed by either a law
2800 enforcement agency or by the district school board. If the
Page 112 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2801 officer is employed by the district school board, the district
2802 school board is the employing agency for purposes of chapter
2803 943, and must comply with that chapter.
2804 (b) A school safety officer has and shall exercise the
2805 power to make arrests for violations of law on district school
2806 board property or on property owned or leased by a charter
2807 school under a charter contract, as applicable, and to arrest
2808 persons, whether on or off such property, who violate any law on
2809 such property under the same conditions that deputy sheriffs are
2810 authorized to make arrests. A school safety officer has the
2811 authority to carry weapons when performing his or her official
2812 duties.
2813 (c) School safety officers must complete mental health
2814 crisis intervention training using a curriculum developed by a
2815 national organization with expertise in mental health crisis
2816 intervention. The training shall improve officers' knowledge and
2817 skills as first responders to incidents involving students with
2818 emotional disturbance or mental illness, including de-escalation
2819 skills to ensure student and officer safety.
2820 (d) A district school board may enter into mutual aid
2821 agreements with one or more law enforcement agencies as provided
2822 in chapter 23. A school safety officer's salary may be paid
2823 jointly by the district school board and the law enforcement
2824 agency, as mutually agreed to.
2825 (3) SCHOOL GUARDIAN.—
Page 113 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2826 (a) At the school district's or the charter school
2827 governing board's discretion, as applicable, pursuant to s.
2828 30.15, a school district or charter school governing board may
2829 participate in the Chris Hixon, Coach Aaron Feis, and Coach
2830 Scott Beigel Guardian Program to meet the requirement of
2831 establishing a safe-school officer. The following individuals
2832 may serve as a school guardian, in support of school-sanctioned
2833 activities for purposes of s. 790.115, upon satisfactory
2834 completion of the requirements under s. 30.15(1)(k) and
2835 certification by a sheriff:
2836 1. A school district employee or personnel, as defined
2837 under s. 1012.01, or a charter school employee, as provided
2838 under s. 1002.33(12)(a), who volunteers to serve as a school
2839 guardian in addition to his or her official job duties; or
2840 2. An employee of a school district or a charter school
2841 who is hired for the specific purpose of serving as a school
2842 guardian.
2843 (b) Before appointing an individual as a school guardian,
2844 the school district or charter school shall contact the
2845 Department of Law Enforcement and review all information
2846 maintained under s. 30.15(1)(k)3.c. related to the individual.
2847 (c) The department shall provide to the Department of Law
2848 Enforcement any information relating to a school guardian
2849 received pursuant to subsection (5).
2850 (4) SCHOOL SECURITY GUARD.—A school district or charter
Page 114 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2851 school governing board may contract with a security agency as
2852 defined in s. 493.6101(18) to employ as a school security guard
2853 an individual who holds a Class "D" and Class "G" license
2854 pursuant to chapter 493, provided the following training and
2855 contractual conditions are met:
2856 (a) An individual who serves as a school security guard,
2857 for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this section,
2858 must:
2859 1. Demonstrate completion of 144 hours of required
2860 training conducted by a sheriff pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.
2861 2. Pass a psychological evaluation administered by a
2862 psychologist licensed under chapter 490 and designated by the
2863 Department of Law Enforcement and submit the results of the
2864 evaluation to the sheriff's office and school district, charter
2865 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
2866 applicable. The Department of Law Enforcement is authorized to
2867 provide the sheriff's office, school district, charter school
2868 governing board, or employing security agency with mental health
2869 and substance abuse data for compliance with this paragraph.
2870 3. Submit to and pass an initial drug test and subsequent
2871 random drug tests in accordance with the requirements of s.
2872 112.0455 and the sheriff's office, school district, charter
2873 school governing board, or employing security agency, as
2874 applicable.
2875 4. Be approved to work as a school security guard by the
Page 115 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2876 sheriff of each county in which the school security guard will
2877 be assigned to a school before commencing work at any school in
2878 that county. The sheriff's approval authorizes the security
2879 agency to assign the school security guard to any school in the
2880 county, and the sheriff's approval is not limited to any
2881 particular school.
2882 5. Successfully complete ongoing training, weapon
2883 inspection, and firearm qualification conducted by a sheriff
2884 pursuant to s. 30.15(1)(k)2.e. on at least an annual basis and
2885 provide documentation to the sheriff's office, school district,
2886 charter school governing board, or employing security agency, as
2887 applicable.
2888 (b) The contract between a security agency and a school
2889 district or a charter school governing board regarding
2890 requirements applicable to school security guards serving in the
2891 capacity of a safe-school officer for purposes of satisfying the
2892 requirements of this section shall define the entity or entities
2893 responsible for maintaining records relating to training,
2894 inspection, and firearm qualification.
2895 (c) School security guards serving in the capacity of a
2896 safe-school officer pursuant to this subsection are in support
2897 of school-sanctioned activities for purposes of s. 790.115, and
2898 must aid in the prevention or abatement of active assailant
2899 incidents on school premises.
2900 (d) The Office of Safe Schools shall provide the
Page 116 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2901 Department of Law Enforcement any information related to a
2902 school security guard that the office receives pursuant to
2903 subsection (5).
2904 (5) NOTIFICATION.—The district school superintendent or
2905 charter school administrator, or a respective designee shall
2906 notify the county sheriff and the Office of Safe Schools
2907 immediately after, but no later than 72 hours after:
2908 (a) A safe-school officer is dismissed for misconduct or
2909 is otherwise disciplined.
2910 (b) A safe-school officer discharges his or her firearm in
2911 the exercise of the safe-school officer's duties, other than for
2912 training purposes.
2913 (6) CRISIS INTERVENTION TRAINING.—Each safe-school officer
2914 who is also a sworn law enforcement officer shall complete
2915 mental health crisis intervention training using a curriculum
2916 developed by a national organization with expertise in mental
2917 health crisis intervention. The training must improve the
2918 officer's knowledge and skills as a first responder to incidents
2919 involving students with emotional disturbance or mental illness,
2920 including de-escalation skills to ensure student and officer
2921 safety.
2922 (7) LIMITATIONS.—An individual must satisfy the background
2923 screening, psychological evaluation, and drug test requirements
2924 and be approved by the sheriff before participating in any
2925 training required by s. 30.15(1)(k), which may be conducted only
Page 117 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2926 by a sheriff.
2927 (8) EXEMPTION.—Any information that would identify whether
2928 a particular individual has been appointed as a safe-school
2929 officer pursuant to this section held by a law enforcement
2930 agency, school district, or charter school is exempt from s.
2931 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
2932
2933 If a district school board, through its adopted policies,
2934 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any
2935 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school
2936 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety
2937 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the
2938 charter school's share of the costs of the school resource
2939 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school
2940 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s.
2941 1011.62(9) s. 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school
2942 district.
2943 Section 55. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) and paragraph
2944 (b) of subsection (3) of section 1010.20, Florida Statutes, are
2945 amended to read:
2946 1010.20 Cost accounting and reporting for school
2947 districts.—
2948 (2) COST REPORTING.—
2949 (a) Each district shall report on a district-aggregate
2950 basis expenditures for inservice training pursuant to s.
Page 118 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2951 1011.62(3) and for categorical programs as provided in s.
2952 1011.62(14) s. 1011.62(18).
2953 (3) PROGRAM EXPENDITURE REQUIREMENTS.—
2954 (b) Funds for inservice training established in s.
2955 1011.62(3) and for categorical programs established in s.
2956 1011.62(14) s. 1011.62(18) shall be expended for the costs of
2957 the identified programs as provided by law and in accordance
2958 with the rules of the State Board of Education.
2959 Section 56. Section 1011.15, Florida Statutes, is amended
2960 to read:
2961 1011.15 Obligations to eliminate major emergency
2962 conditions.—The district school board of any district
2963 experiencing a major emergency condition in an existing school
2964 plant that demands immediate correction in order to prevent
2965 further damage to the building or equipment or to eliminate a
2966 safety hazard that constitutes an immediate danger to the
2967 students and other occupants is authorized to create an
2968 obligation for a period of 1 year by way of anticipation of
2969 revenues for capital outlay purposes accruing on a current basis
2970 without pledging the credit of the district. Such obligation may
2971 be extended from year to year with the consent of the lender for
2972 a period not to exceed 4 years, or for a total of 5 years
2973 including the initial year of the loan. Obligations occurring
2974 under this section may be repaid from funds to be received from
2975 taxes authorized by s. 1011.71(2) and from any other funds
Page 119 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
2976 available to the district school board for the purpose under the
2977 following conditions:
2978 (1) DISTRICT SCHOOL BOARD TO ADOPT PROPOSAL.—When the
2979 district school board proposes to incur obligations of the
2980 nature authorized in this section, it shall adopt and spread
2981 upon its minutes a resolution fully describing the emergency
2982 condition outlined above, giving the nature of the obligations
2983 to be incurred, stating the plan of payment, and providing that
2984 such funds will be budgeted during the period of the loan from
2985 the current revenue to retire the obligations maturing during
2986 the year. This plan of payment shall not extend over a period
2987 longer than 1 year.
2988 (2) INTEREST-BEARING NOTES AUTHORIZED.—Each district
2989 school board which has authorized the incurring of the
2990 obligations as provided in this section shall issue interest-
2991 bearing notes for the obligations. The notes shall provide the
2992 terms of payment and shall not bear interest in excess of the
2993 rate authorized in s. 1010.59.
2994 Section 57. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
2995 1011.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
2996 1011.18 School depositories; payments into and withdrawals
2997 from depositories.—
2998 (6) EXEMPTION FOR SELF-INSURANCE PROGRAMS AND THIRD-PARTY
2999 ADMINISTERED EMPLOYEES' FRINGE BENEFIT PROGRAMS.—
3000 (b) The district school board may contract with an
Page 120 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3001 insurance company or professional administrator who holds a
3002 valid certificate of authority issued by the Office of Insurance
3003 Regulation of the Financial Services Commission to provide any
3004 services that a third-party administrator is authorized by law
3005 to perform. Pursuant to such contract, the district school board
3006 may advance or remit money to the administrator to be deposited
3007 in a designated special checking account for paying claims
3008 against the district school board under its self-insurance
3009 programs, and remitting premiums to the providers of insured
3010 benefits on behalf of the district school board and the
3011 participants in such programs, and otherwise fulfilling the
3012 obligations imposed upon the administrator by law and the
3013 contractual agreements between the district school board and the
3014 administrator. The special checking account shall be maintained
3015 in a designated district school depository. The district school
3016 board may replenish such account as often as necessary upon the
3017 presentation by the service organization of documentation for
3018 claims or premiums due paid equal to the amount of the requested
3019 reimbursement. Such replenishment shall be made by a warrant
3020 signed by the chair of the district school board and
3021 countersigned by the district school superintendent. Such
3022 replenishment may be made by electronic, telephonic, or other
3023 medium, and each transfer shall be confirmed in writing and
3024 signed by the district school superintendent or his or her
3025 designee. The provisions of strict accountability of all funds
Page 121 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3026 and an annual audit by an independent certified public
3027 accountant as provided in s. 1001.42(12)(j) s. 1001.42(12)(k)
3028 apply to this subsection.
3029 Section 58. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
3030 1012.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
3031 1012.22 Public school personnel; powers and duties of the
3032 district school board.—The district school board shall:
3033 (3)
3034 (b) Appearances before the board.—If a district school
3035 superintendent appears before the state board to provide an
3036 update under s. 1011.62(11)(e) s. 1011.62(14)(e), the state
3037 board must require that the president of the collective
3038 bargaining unit that represents the school district also must
3039 appear.
3040 Section 59. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2), paragraph (e)
3041 of subsection (3), and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of
3042 section 1013.64, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3043 1013.64 Funds for comprehensive educational plant needs;
3044 construction cost maximums for school district capital
3045 projects.—Allocations from the Public Education Capital Outlay
3046 and Debt Service Trust Fund to the various boards for capital
3047 outlay projects shall be determined as follows:
3048 (2)(a) The department shall establish, as a part of the
3049 Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund, a
3050 separate account, in an amount determined by the Legislature, to
Page 122 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3051 be known as the "Special Facility Construction Account." The
3052 Special Facility Construction Account shall be used to provide
3053 necessary construction funds to school districts which have
3054 urgent construction needs but which lack sufficient resources at
3055 present, and cannot reasonably anticipate sufficient resources
3056 within the period of the next 3 years, for these purposes from
3057 currently authorized sources of capital outlay revenue. A school
3058 district requesting funding from the Special Facility
3059 Construction Account shall submit one specific construction
3060 project, not to exceed one complete educational plant, to the
3061 Special Facility Construction Committee. A district may not
3062 receive funding for more than one approved project in any 3-year
3063 period or while any portion of the district's participation
3064 requirement is outstanding. The first year of the 3-year period
3065 shall be the first year a district receives an appropriation.
3066 The department shall encourage a construction program that
3067 reduces the average size of schools in the district. The request
3068 must meet the following criteria to be considered by the
3069 committee:
3070 1. The project must be deemed a critical need and must be
3071 recommended for funding by the Special Facility Construction
3072 Committee. Before developing construction plans for the proposed
3073 facility, the district school board must request a
3074 preapplication review by the Special Facility Construction
3075 Committee or a project review subcommittee convened by the chair
Page 123 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3076 of the committee to include two representatives of the
3077 department and two staff members from school districts not
3078 eligible to participate in the program. A school district may
3079 request a preapplication review at any time; however, if the
3080 district school board seeks inclusion in the department's next
3081 annual capital outlay legislative budget request, the
3082 preapplication review request must be made before February 1.
3083 Within 90 days after receiving the preapplication review
3084 request, the committee or subcommittee must meet in the school
3085 district to review the project proposal and existing facilities.
3086 To determine whether the proposed project is a critical need,
3087 the committee or subcommittee shall consider, at a minimum, the
3088 capacity of all existing facilities within the district as
3089 determined by the Florida Inventory of School Houses; the
3090 district's pattern of student growth; the district's existing
3091 and projected capital outlay full-time equivalent student
3092 enrollment as determined by the demographic, revenue, and
3093 education estimating conferences established in s. 216.136; the
3094 district's existing satisfactory student stations; the use of
3095 all existing district property and facilities; grade level
3096 configurations; and any other information that may affect the
3097 need for the proposed project.
3098 2. The construction project must be recommended in the
3099 most recent survey or survey amendment cooperatively prepared by
3100 the district and the department, and approved by the department
Page 124 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3101 under the rules of the State Board of Education. If a district
3102 employs a consultant in the preparation of a survey or survey
3103 amendment, the consultant may not be employed by or receive
3104 compensation from a third party that designs or constructs a
3105 project recommended by the survey.
3106 3. The construction project must appear on the district's
3107 approved project priority list under the rules of the State
3108 Board of Education.
3109 4. The district must have selected and had approved a site
3110 for the construction project in compliance with s. 1013.36 and
3111 the rules of the State Board of Education.
3112 5. The district shall have developed a district school
3113 board adopted list of facilities that do not exceed the norm for
3114 net square feet occupancy requirements under the State
3115 Requirements for Educational Facilities, using all possible
3116 programmatic combinations for multiple use of space to obtain
3117 maximum daily use of all spaces within the facility under
3118 consideration.
3119 6. Upon construction, the total cost per student station,
3120 including change orders, must not exceed the cost per student
3121 station as provided in subsection (6) unless approved by the
3122 Special Facility Construction Committee. At the discretion of
3123 the committee, costs that exceed the cost per student station
3124 for special facilities may include legal and administrative
3125 fees, the cost of site improvements or related offsite
Page 125 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3126 improvements, the cost of complying with public shelter and
3127 hurricane hardening requirements, cost overruns created by a
3128 disaster as defined in s. 252.34(2), costs of security
3129 enhancements approved by the school safety specialist, and
3130 unforeseeable circumstances beyond the district's control.
3131 7. There shall be an agreement signed by the district
3132 school board stating that it will advertise for bids within 30
3133 days of receipt of its encumbrance authorization from the
3134 department.
3135 8. For construction projects for which Special Facilities
3136 Construction Account funding is sought before the 2019-2020
3137 fiscal year, the district shall, at the time of the request and
3138 for a continuing period necessary to meet the district's
3139 participation requirement, levy the maximum millage against its
3140 nonexempt assessed property value as allowed in s. 1011.71(2) or
3141 shall raise an equivalent amount of revenue from the school
3142 capital outlay surtax authorized under s. 212.055(6). Beginning
3143 with construction projects for which Special Facilities
3144 Construction Account funding is sought in the 2019-2020 fiscal
3145 year, the district shall, for a minimum of 3 years before
3146 submitting the request and for a continuing period necessary to
3147 meet its participation requirement, levy the maximum millage
3148 against the district's nonexempt assessed property value as
3149 authorized under s. 1011.71(2) or shall raise an equivalent
3150 amount of revenue from the school capital outlay surtax
Page 126 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3151 authorized under s. 212.055(6). Any district with a new or
3152 active project, funded under the provisions of this subsection,
3153 shall be required to budget no more than the value of 1 mill per
3154 year to the project until the district's participation
3155 requirement relating to the local discretionary capital
3156 improvement millage or the equivalent amount of revenue from the
3157 school capital outlay surtax is satisfied.
3158 8.9. If a contract has not been signed 90 days after the
3159 advertising of bids, the funding for the specific project shall
3160 revert to the Special Facility New Construction Account to be
3161 reallocated to other projects on the list. However, an
3162 additional 90 days may be granted by the commissioner.
3163 9.10. The department shall certify the inability of the
3164 district to fund the survey-recommended project over a
3165 continuous 3-year period using projected capital outlay revenue
3166 derived from s. 9(d), Art. XII of the State Constitution, as
3167 amended, and paragraph (3)(a) of this section, and s.
3168 1011.71(2).
3169 10.11. The district shall have on file with the department
3170 an adopted resolution acknowledging its commitment to satisfy
3171 its participation requirement, which is equivalent to all
3172 unencumbered and future revenue acquired from s. 9(d), Art. XII
3173 of the State Constitution, as amended, and paragraph (3)(a) of
3174 this section, and s. 1011.71(2), in the year of the initial
3175 appropriation and for the 2 years immediately following the
Page 127 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3176 initial appropriation.
3177 11.12. Phase I plans must be approved by the district
3178 school board as being in compliance with the building and life
3179 safety codes before June 1 of the year the application is made.
3180 (3)
3181 (e) A district school board may lease relocatable
3182 educational facilities for up to 3 years using nonbonded PECO
3183 funds and for any time period using local capital outlay
3184 millage.
3185 (6)
3186 (b)1. A district school board may not use funds from the
3187 following sources: Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt
3188 Service Trust Fund; School District and Community College
3189 District Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund; Classrooms
3190 First Program funds provided in s. 1013.68; nonvoted 1.5-mill
3191 levy of ad valorem property taxes provided in s. 1011.71(2);
3192 Classrooms for Kids Program funds provided in s. 1013.735;
3193 District Effort Recognition Program funds provided in s.
3194 1013.736; or High Growth District Capital Outlay Assistance
3195 Grant Program funds provided in s. 1013.738 to pay for any
3196 portion of the cost of any new construction of educational plant
3197 space with a total cost per student station, including change
3198 orders, which exceeds:
3199 a. $17,952 for an elementary school;
3200 b. $19,386 for a middle school; or
Page 128 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3201 c. $25,181 for a high school,
3202
3203 (January 2006) as adjusted annually to reflect increases or
3204 decreases in the Consumer Price Index. The department, in
3205 conjunction with the Office of Economic and Demographic
3206 Research, shall review and adjust the cost per student station
3207 limits to reflect actual construction costs by January 1, 2020,
3208 and annually thereafter. The adjusted cost per student station
3209 shall be used by the department for computation of the statewide
3210 average costs per student station for each instructional level
3211 pursuant to paragraph (d). The department shall also collaborate
3212 with the Office of Economic and Demographic Research to select
3213 an industry-recognized construction index to replace the
3214 Consumer Price Index by January 1, 2020, adjusted annually to
3215 reflect changes in the construction index.
3216 2. School districts shall maintain accurate documentation
3217 related to the costs of all new construction of educational
3218 plant space reported to the Department of Education pursuant to
3219 paragraph (d). The Auditor General shall review the
3220 documentation maintained by the school districts and verify
3221 compliance with the limits under this paragraph during its
3222 scheduled operational audits of the school district.
3223 3. Except for educational facilities and sites subject to
3224 a lease-purchase agreement entered pursuant to s. 1011.71(2)(e)
3225 or funded solely through local impact fees, in addition to the
Page 129 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3226 funding sources listed in subparagraph 1., a district school
3227 board may not use funds from any sources for new construction of
3228 educational plant space with a total cost per student station,
3229 including change orders, which equals more than the current
3230 adjusted amounts provided in sub-subparagraphs 1.a.-c. However,
3231 if a contract has been executed for architectural and design
3232 services or for construction management services before July 1,
3233 2017, a district school board may use funds from any source for
3234 the new construction of educational plant space and such funds
3235 are exempt from the total cost per student station requirements.
3236 4. A district school board must not use funds from the
3237 Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund or
3238 the School District and Community College District Capital
3239 Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund for any new construction of
3240 an ancillary plant that exceeds 70 percent of the average cost
3241 per square foot of new construction for all schools.
3242 Section 60. Section 1013.738, Florida Statutes, is amended
3243 to read:
3244 1013.738 High Growth District Capital Outlay Assistance
3245 Grant Program.—
3246 (1) Subject to funds provided in the General
3247 Appropriations Act, the High Growth District Capital Outlay
3248 Assistance Grant Program is hereby established. Funds provided
3249 pursuant to this section may only be used for the purposes
3250 identified in s. 1011.71(2).
Page 130 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3251 (2) In order to qualify for a grant, a school district
3252 must meet the following criteria:
3253 (a) The district must have levied the maximum mills of
3254 nonvoted discretionary capital outlay millage authorized in s.
3255 1011.71(2) for each of the prior 5 fiscal years.
3256 (a)(b) The district must receive revenue from a current
3257 voted school capital outlay sales surtax or a portion of the
3258 local government infrastructure surtax as authorized in s.
3259 212.055.
3260 (c) The revenue derived from the nonvoted discretionary
3261 capital outlay millage, when divided by the district's capital
3262 outlay FTE students, produces a value that is less than the
3263 statewide average maximum potential funds per capital outlay FTE
3264 student for the most recent fiscal year.
3265 (b)(d) The district must have equaled or exceeded the
3266 greater of 1 percent average growth or twice the statewide
3267 average of growth in capital outlay FTE students over the prior
3268 5-year period.
3269 (c)(e) The total capital outlay FTE students of the
3270 district is greater than 24,000 students.
3271 (3) The funds provided in the General Appropriations Act
3272 shall be allocated pursuant to the following methodology:
3273 (a) For each eligible district, the Department of
3274 Education shall take sum the calculated revenue from the maximum
3275 potential nonvoted discretionary capital outlay millage and the
Page 131 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3276 revenue received from the voted sales surtax as provided in
3277 paragraph (2)(a) (2)(b) and divide that sum by the number of
3278 capital outlay FTE students for the same period.
3279 (b) The Department of Education shall determine, for each
3280 eligible district, the amount that must be added to the funds
3281 per capital outlay FTE calculated pursuant to paragraph (a) to
3282 produce the statewide average value per capital outlay FTE for
3283 the revenues identified pursuant to paragraph (a).
3284 (c) The value calculated for each eligible district
3285 pursuant to paragraph (b) shall be the maximum amount of a grant
3286 that may be awarded to a district pursuant to this section.
3287 (d) In the event the funds provided are insufficient to
3288 fully fund the maximum grants calculated pursuant to this
3289 section, the Department of Education shall allocate the funds
3290 based on each district's prorated share of the total maximum
3291 award amount calculated for all eligible districts.
3292 Section 61. Subsections (1) and (5) of section 1013.75,
3293 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3294 1013.75 Cooperative funding of career center facilities.—
3295 (1) Each district school board operating a designated
3296 career center may submit, prior to August 1 of each year, a
3297 request to the commissioner for funds from the Public Education
3298 Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund to plan, construct,
3299 and equip a career center facility identified as being critical
3300 to the economic development and the workforce needs of the
Page 132 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3301 school district. Prior to submitting a request, each school
3302 district shall:
3303 (a) Adopt and submit to the commissioner a resolution
3304 indicating its commitment to fund the planning, construction,
3305 and equipping of the proposed facility at 40 percent of the
3306 requested project amount. The resolution shall also designate
3307 the locale of the proposed facility. If funds from a private or
3308 noneducational public entity are to be committed to the project,
3309 then a joint resolution shall be required.
3310 (b) Except as provided in paragraph (5)(b), levy the
3311 maximum millage against the nonexempt assessed property value as
3312 provided in s. 1011.71(2).
3313 (b)(c) Certify to the Office of Workforce and Economic
3314 Development that the project has been survey recommended.
3315 (c)(d) Certify to the Office of Workforce and Economic
3316 Development that final phase III construction documents comply
3317 with applicable building codes and life safety codes.
3318 (d)(e) Sign an agreement that the district school board
3319 shall advertise for bids within 90 days of receiving an
3320 encumbrance authorization from the department.
3321 (e)(f) If a construction contract has not been signed 90
3322 days after the advertising of bids, certify to the Office of
3323 Workforce and Economic Development and the department the cause
3324 for delay. Upon request, an additional 90 days may be granted by
3325 the commissioner.
Page 133 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3326 (5)(a) Upon approval of a project, the commissioner shall
3327 include up to 60 percent of the total cost of the project in the
3328 legislative capital outlay budget request as provided in s.
3329 1013.60 for educational plants. The participating district
3330 school board shall provide 40 percent of the total cost of the
3331 project. When practical, the district school board shall solicit
3332 and encourage a private or noneducational public entity to
3333 commit to finance a portion of the funds to complete the
3334 planning, construction, and equipping of the facility. If a site
3335 does not exist, the purchase price or, if donated, the assessed
3336 value of a site may be included in meeting the funding
3337 requirements of the district school board, a private or
3338 noneducational public entity, or the educational agency. The
3339 value of existing sites, intended to satisfy any portion of the
3340 funding requirement of a private or noneducational public
3341 entity, shall be determined by an independent appraiser under
3342 contract with the board. The size of the site to adequately
3343 provide for the implementation of the proposed educational
3344 programs shall be determined by the board. Funds from the Public
3345 Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund may not be
3346 expended on any project unless specifically authorized by the
3347 Legislature.
3348 (b) In the event that a school district is not levying the
3349 maximum millage against the nonexempt assessed property value
3350 pursuant to paragraph (1)(b), state and school district funding
Page 134 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 789 2026
3351 pursuant to paragraph (a) shall be reduced by the same
3352 proportion as the millage actually being levied bears to the
3353 maximum allowable millage.
3354 Section 62. This act shall take effect on the effective
3355 date of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by HJR
3356 787 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same
3357 specific intent and purpose, if such amendment is approved at
3358 the next general election or at an earlier special election
3359 specifically authorized by law for that purpose.
Page 135 of 135
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb789-00